Depends on how far along the child is, if the pregnancy is not past the first trimester then no it is not taking a life. For it has nothing to be innocent of, it has not yet lived to experience things that would make it innocent or guilty which are both conscious thought processes that a baby does not possess especially as a fetus. A fetus is a parasite, living off of the host until the pregnancy has been full filled and the baby has been birthed. Only then would it be the taking of an innocent life.
But it is going to be life most people regret having abortion. Just because it is not completely formed does not mean it is alive. Why is it not okay to murder a kid at lets say 12 but its okay to kill a baby before it is even born?
"killing a baby is killing an innocent life. Why? well first of all, you don't give the baby a chance to live." If you don't give the "baby" a chance to live, then how can there be a life to kill?
are you serious it doesn't matter if the baby doesn't have an age or if he / she is 15 you should never be able to kill a life
An embryo and foetus are not lives. A life has a developed brain and body. The best argument you can make is that 10% of abortions might involve a foetus that is on the brink of being a life.
Because the 12-year old is aware, it is alive. A foetus when aborted 40% of the time isn't alive. It doesn't have a heart, 50% of the time it doesn't have a brain.
so what if it doesn't have a brain yet still is going to get one and still has a whole future in front of him/her.
It will still come to feel pain, think comprehend, and has more life ahead of him/her then a 12 year old.
It's definitely dishonest to present this as a picture of abortion in general, and sadly it preys on people who have no better source of information. Most women will not have abortions using this procedure, and their fetuses will not look at all like that. They probably will not even be recognizably human. If a woman went to a clinic, she would at least be told the truth about what would happen to her if she wanted an abortion. However, D&E;is still in use today although it counts for a small fraction of all procedures. Abortions aren't pretty, no matter how they're done. If you are pro-choice, you may have to accept the fact that they are just tough for laypeople to look at, even suction aspiration. It's not at all a point in favor of pro-life; childbirth and open-heart surgery can turn stomachs, too.
What could we show that you would find acceptable as the picture of abortion. You people do not care about medical facts, scientific facts. IT DOES NOT MATTER IN THE LEAST TO YOU. You want abortion legal…on demand period. The fact is abortion is the act of KILLING A LIVING HUMAN BEING. THAT IS A SCIENTIFIC FACT. The heart starts beating around 22 days…..THAT IS A SCIENTIFIC FACT. Now I know what our laws say…that killing should be an option for women. But tell me….what would you call killing a living human being without its permission? The unborn can't speak for themselves. It does not matter what the procedure is…it outcome is the same thing. Death to the unborn. It is killing by burning, scrapping, dismembering, vacuuming the child until its dead. That is every abortionists goal. The unborn has to be killed in the womb….not outside. This picture is accurate and shows abortion. Those who are pro-abortion of course would not like this pic….it puts action to reality…it gives a face to what they condone. And what they condone is barbaric. This is a surgery or procedure that is like none else on earth. Most doctors try to save lives. And abortionists kill lives.
Pretending pro-life people care about scientific fact is bullshit. Not that it's impossible to be scientifically honest and still be pro-life, but so many outspoken pro-life people and groups who have no problem using misinformation, emotional blackmail, intimidation and deceit to manipulate people into doing what pro-life thinks is right. Pro-choice people don't have to lie, because they don't care if no one chooses an abortion as long as they aren't being lied to or bullied. In fact, I think you'd find most pro-choice people would agree that the fewer people need/want abortions, the better. But being dishonest or cruel is not the way to go about making that happen. Why are D&E;illustrations so commonly used for pro-life propaganda when D&E;accounts for less than 5% of all procedures? Not because it's an honest representation of what most abortions look like, because it isn't. It's because it's supposed to be scarier and more guilt-inducing. If you show this picture to an average woman who is considering an abortion and tell her this is what her procedure will look like, you are probably lying to her. (I'm not the one putting the semicolon after D&E;, the website is doing that.) You want abortion legal…on demand period. You got it. Please show me where I denied that a fetus is a human. Oh wait, I didn't, because I'm not an idiot. Of course a fetus is a human- did you expect me to claim it's a different species? The argument for abortion is sometimes concerned with personhood, not the presence of homo sapien DNA and you're getting the two confused. But I think abortion would still be acceptable even if the government extended legal personhood to fetuses. One human should not use another human as a life support system unless the host is giving ongoing consent. This applies regardless of the age or legal status of either party or the relationship between the parties. If it's in your body and you don't want it there, you have a right to try to find someone who will take it out.. Abortion if it's a fetus, murder if it's not. It's cool how there's two different names for that, isn't it? That's so we don't get them confused. Oh shit, really?! Well then call me pro-life! Or don't, because I already knew that. Maybe say some more obvious things. I'm fine with it. It's not pretty but it's a fairly realistic representation of an uncommon medical procedure. Medical procedures generally are not pretty. It's the use of it to scare women who won't even be getting this procedure that I have a problem with. More obvious things! If there is someone here who didn't realize abortion exterminates a living thing, I'm sure they'll thank you.
I've agreed with a lot of your argument, but I'm particularly disturbed at the part where" This line of thinking is rational, but some women would use it to justify promiscuity. I believe in abortion in cases where:- the mother and/or father are too young to support a child, or the mother and/or father are in a situation that would not be a positive environment for a child (ie, abusive relationship(s), poverty/homelessness, etc.);- the mother's/fetus's life is at risk,- the fetus is the result of a rape or incestuous encounter;- the fetus has a very high chance of developing some debilitating disease/malformation that will make its developing life difficult. In women who are promiscuous and take no time to learn about/use contraceptives, they should not use abortion as a Plan B. If they are not ready for a child, and plan to have sex, then they should learn more responsibility and practice safe sex, not just assume they won't get pregnant.
Admit you're killing a baby...but again..shit happens..it's your choice. These pro-lifers then, they better be cranking out a baby every time the female produces an egg..or at least tries. By not fertilizing that egg, you are in fact preventing life to live. Are you a dick? Preventing a life to live...killing a life...whats teh difference? You have the power of God either way.
What did this guy just say? It's a simple choice...are you ok with killing a baby while it's growing in the mother. Sure..."stuff" happens. Move on...just admitt you're killing and say, "I'm pro-choice". You killed 1000 bugs on your way to work, you're a killer anyway...live with it. Let humans decide.
His mental state is of no consequence. His point is valid. Abortion is ending a human life. Pro-choice condones abortions, therefore pro-choice condones the killing of human lives. You either accept that or you don't.
You have not made any argument for whether or not abortion should be considered morally wrong or not. So even if we were to dismiss his mental state and even if we were to accept that abortion ends a human life (which I wouldn't be inclined to do), we have no reason to believe that abortion is morally wrong.
Pro-aborts have a big problem. They celebrate abortion but don't want the label that goes with it. They don't want people to think they condone killing…. And your right…..they probably feel worse about killing those bugs with their cars…then they do living human beings.
What is false about anything I have posted concerning abortion? This issue is a piece of cake. Let science and medicine speak the truth. The truth is…from conception that which is in the womb is alive. Most abortions happen after the heart starts beating. "In the third month, your baby is the size of a small apple and is fully formed. She has grown from 1 to 3 inches and weighs about 1 ½ ounces by month end. Her head now sits on her neck and you can even see the whorl of a hair pattern on the top of her head. Her head is still very large and makes up half the length of her body. Her eyes are moving closer together and her ears are continuing to form. She has taste buds and has developed the sucking reflex. She is beginning to practice her swallowing too. Teeth buds have also begun to form, as well as fingernails and toenails. Her major organs, as well as her sex organs have formed and are developing steadily. Your placenta has now developed and has taken over hormone production." Most abortions happen around this gestational age. Wow a lot happening eh? It is not just a glob of tissue. THIS IS FACT. Why can't you pro-aborts just admit it. However barbaric…abortion should be celebrated and should be allowed…however horrendous it is. You are the ones who can't face the facts in the moral debate on abortions. You are blind to what the truth says.
And so? Even if it may seem horrendous, it does not necessarily imply that it ought not to be allowed or done. All you have done here is simply appeal to emotion and given no logical arguments for your position. Really? Let's think about it then. If a mother is definitely going to die very slowly and painfully if the baby is not aborted, is it more immoral to abort the baby or allow the mother to die a slow and agonising death? Let me raise another scenario. What if a minor was impregnated by a violent rape and the rapist does not take responsibility for the child? Is it more immoral to leave a defenceless and helpless minor to care for a baby, a constant psychological reminder of rape, or for her to abort? I'm not talking about who you would have more sympathy for, but merely on what moral grounds do you have to say abortion is immoral. By logic, you yourself have no good reason to be opposed to abortion.
First of all, you further the previous point made about disinformation in how the quote you posted uses 'she' instead of 'they', attempting to personify the foetus further than it should be. Every single part of your body can be considered alive, except your nails and hair and a few others, I believe. Cutting off a piece of skin holds no moral issues for you, I would guess, it's a similar idea. Except a foetus will cost thousands of pounds/dollars/euros, will take thousands of hours of time, will restrict you throughout your entire life, cause you to be labelled because of it, and cause you to endure a huge amount of hardship from it. There are reasons for abortion as well, studies have shown that about three quarters of women choose them because of financial reasons, hardly their choice. Why can't you pro-aborts just admit it I think you'll have to look very hard to find someone who is actually pro abortion, I've definitely never met someone who openly admits to that. It's pro-choice. Actually, humans kill thousands of life forms every single second, just because it's seen as morally wrong there is a big issue with abortion. Why should it be morally wrong? Please give me a reason why it is so intrinsically bad to take a life with no emotion? I would suggest that Pro-Lifer's are not necessarily blind to truth, they see it, they simply ignore the truth of what happens to those who are not allowed abortions. Abortion rates does not change massively when it is outlawed, all that happens is they do it illegally and unsafely. Further, the argument made by Republican candidates is that abortion should be outlawed to protect the 'nuclear family'. Hardly relevant, as typical, married, happy, nuclear families would not get abortions a significant amount of the time. Give me a convincing argument as to why abortion is so bad.
Anyone who is pro-choice is pro-abortion…there is no difference. They don't like the label however but its the truth. I just got banned from a place because I refused to stop using the term pro-abort to describe someone who …DOES NOT WANT LEGAL PROTECTION FOR THE LIVING HUMAN BEING IN THE WOMB. This is not a pro-life person. This is a person who even though they might not get an abortion themselves…is willing to sit by quietly while others kill in the name of CHOICE. THEY ARE PRO-ABORTS. I can just see someone at a Right to Life convention…standing up and saying…." I am pro-life but believe that women should have the choice to kill." They would be laughed out of the room. There is no difference between someone who is pro-abortion and someone who is pro-choice…they want the same thing….legalized killing. Cutting off a piece of skin….compared to stopping a beating heart of a human in the womb…..you think is the same thing? Laughable…won't even comment. You probably no doubt think that killing a bug is the same as killing a human being….hey they are both alive right? Yes babies are costly. How much did your parents foot the bill for your maintenance? At least your mother allowed you life…and you are here debating and defending the rights of other mothers…to kill, to take away the rights of others. What is it that Ronald Reagan said…it was so true. Question….I know you are pro-abortion. Do you believe the a woman has the right to kill throughout the entire nine months? Oh I can't wait to see just how many rights you give women….to own their bodies. Why is abortion bad you ask? and I quote…."" What is wrong with owning the label? You tell me what is wrong with being called pro-abortion? Is there something wrong with abortion Ben? If there is…then why do you support it? If there isn't…why isn't the label ok? LOL
Ok, I'm amazed you're actually being this ridiculous about a simple name. Pro abortion means you want abortions. Pro choice means you want the choice of abortions. There is a big difference. I do not like that people get abortions. I simply think it's the lesser evil of two, especially when you look at statistics that show that abortion laws don't stop abortions, they just stop safe abortions. This leads to major risks to both the baby and the mother. It's common for pro lifers to accuse pro-choice supporters of being blind to the facts, when it is they who rarely actually consider the women that they're condemning. I think it's bad, I'm asking you why it's so bad. You haven't answered any of my questions, you've simply said that it's bad and that it's the same as pro-abort. Please talk about questions that are actually up for debate, you're wasting your time, attacking something that isn't there. Useless circular rhetoric, sounds clever, but it proves nothing.
And people who are pro-choice want abortions legal. They want laws in place that give the woman the option of killing. And if we had a nationwide vote…and a pro choicer voted…which would he vote…..Pro-choice abortion or no abortion? So you think abortion is bad…but yet you want it legal so others can do it. LOL Abortion is taking a life and that is bad. Abortion procedures are inhumane,,,we don't even do it on animals like we do humans. Nothing is good about abortion. Now I know why you won't answer the …do you believe the woman has the right to kill throughout her entire pregnancy? Because if yes…then wow…you look terrible even to the pro-choicers who use viability as an excuse,,,and if no…then you enslave the woman and your excuse that abortion should be legal because its the woman's body and should be her decision….is shot down. What is it….answer the question. I am debating your position on this and need to know. Are you afraid to answer? It proves that you were blessed with life…..circular or not. The statement Reagan made is true. We are given life, liberty and the pursuit of happiness in our Constitution….but without life we can't have the others. And we deny that which is in the womb the things you and I take for granted.
And there you go. They don't want abortions, they want the option. LOL Yes, pretty much. I think religion is bad, but I'd never consider taking it away from people. I think war is bad, but it can still be valid. I think people being a dick is bad, but I think it is their right. There's lots of things I don't like that I would still support. Just as Voltaire said 'I disapprove of what but I will defend to the death your right to say it', I feel the same way about abortion. Nothing is good about abortion. That's not true. No, I do not. Without being an expert in biology, I'm leaning towards a 'first trimester' option, to me that seems to be the commonly accepted medical grounds. Makes sense, after that the foetus becomes too lifelike, and the emotional trauma is too great. Also, how could you possibly give her the right the whole way through, when she's in labour, that's ridiculously impossible. A time limit makes sense. No, you are. I am not American. Please do not assume that everyone you meet on the internet is American, especially when I've written so in my 'about me'. Yes, but the constitution is a legal document, it can easily be flawed. Just because it's there doesn't make it right, you must verify what. And further, if you did accept it as truth, that only applies to citizens. When a foetus has citizenship, it gains the right to life. To do that, it must be born. So there you go, another circular impossibility, can't gain protection unless it's born, when it doesn't need protection.
No, a baby has been born. An unborn, undeveloped foetus, is not a baby.
Well really, it's they're choice what they wanna do. Not saying it's the right thing to actually do, but it's not our choice. If they don't want the baby, then they don't have the baby. Simple as that. BUT you never know, that baby that was aborted could have been the next president or maybe the next singer everyone talks about.
1. I've yet to see anyone ask a pro-lifer this question; what if a fifteen year old girl is raped, impregnated, and still in school and her parents are unable to support the baby, while the rapist is never caught? 2. Many abortions take place because a family cannot support the baby, or the baby will have some sort of mental disorder to prevent him/her from living life to the fullest. Tell me, would the baby be better off in a world where society discriminates against the mentally challenged, or better in Heaven where things will be perfect and the baby can be taken care of?
You are ignoring the fact that most abortions are for convenience, not rape or any medical need. The most common reasons women consider abortion are: Per webmd.com "The most common reasons women consider abortion are: 1. Birth control (contraceptive) failure. Over half of all women who have an abortion used a contraceptive method during the month they became pregnant.2 Inability to support or care for a child. 3. To end an unwanted pregnancy. 4. To prevent the birth of a child with birth defects or severe medical problems. Such defects are often unknown until routine second-trimester tests are done.5. Pregnancy resulting from rape or incest. 6. Physical or mental conditions that endanger the woman's health if the pregnancy is continued. If the pro-life community were to all agree today that all rape victims should be given abortions (if desired) and then loved without reservation until they are (somewhat) whole again, the pro-abortion industry would give not one inch on their opposition to any restrictions on unlimited abortions. The 'pregnant rape victim' is a red herring, meant only to emotionalize the issue in their favor.
I would be more than happy answering this question. 1. Rape is a violent crime, a violent act. The rapist should be caught and serve punishment. The woman is the victim for sure. And the child she might be carrying also is a victim. ESPECIALLY IF SHE THINKS TWO WRONGS MAKE A RIGHT AND DECIDES TO KILL IT. There is always adoption. In most communities there are Crisis Pregnancy Centers that help women in situations like this. Free medical care…etc. 2. What right do you have to presume you know how someone will life and what quality of life the person might have? You have no right. Oprah came from a household that was poor, she was also a victims of abuse. Look at her now. One of the most successful and rich women in the country, in the world. There is no family…that does not suffer bad things. There are families with drug and alcohol users, families who are poor, divorced…no family skates through life with no trials. Support is an excuse…because there is adoption and there are services that help women who have no money. How dare you imply that all mentally challenged people be aborted. Wow. Hitler had the same mentality and views as your imply here. My brother in law is mentally handicapped and he brings joy into our lives. ARe you perfect? Maybe you should have been aborted…????? ARE you good looking, a millionaire….problemless? I doubt it. What you imply here is outrageous. If babies would be better off dead…because they will be in heaven…then lets kill all children…there would not be a population problem is we did this…we would go extinct. Let me ask you this. Do you think if you went into a hospital nursery full of babies and the nurse told you to pick out the baby whose mother was raped…think you could do it?
Yes I have. Abortion is wrong because it takes a life. The child in the raped woman's body…how is he/she at fault. Why should they lose their life because an act of violence happened to another living human being. Do you think two wrongs make a right? Rape was wrong….but abortion solves and takes away that problem? Its two acts of violence….the rape and the abortion. Abortion is wrong whether the woman was raped or not. If you think all life is sacred then how could I think less of the baby whose mother was raped? Red Herring? It is fact and she has openly talked about her life. Should she have been aborted simply because she had shady relatives…or that they were poor? Are you telling me that there are families that have not endured sadness, death, dying, troubles? Wow. Nothing bad happened to them. Incredible. You skipped over cleverly my question let me reword it. Do you think that mentally challenged, physically challenged people should have been aborted? If it is known that they are not normal…and what is normal anyway…..should they be aborted? yes or no You certainly don't like answering questions when your back is against the wall do you…lmao. I will against ask the question……Do you think if you went into a hospital nursery full of babies and the nurse told you to pick out the baby whose mother was raped…think you could do it? Your lack of an answer…speaks volumes. LOL
There is only one question when it comes to abortion, what is it? If it is a human being then it requires a very high level of justification to take it's life. I have simply seen no argument that comes close to proper justification for the taking the life of a innocent human being. The only arguments I have seen are those that try to take away the embryo's humanity and make it less than human. Roe vs Wade was a very poor decision by the Supreme Court because it introduce a major contradiction in the law. The unjustified taking of a human life is considered murder under current law and we have different degrees to further define it. Consider the fact that if you kill a woman with child; you will be charged for two counts of homicide. But if a doctor kills only one of those persons; no charge. The Supreme Court by their ruling overturned the law they were supposed to uphold. The right thing to do would be to overturn this erroneous ruling and restore our rule of law.
"" So a thirteen year old girl gets raped, and you're saying that the govenrment have the right to force that girl to keep her unwanted baby? I would imagine the girl would never really bond with her baby, and the child would have to grow up knowing of its conception and live with the knowledge that it was not wanted. Surely that is justification enough? That is not a life anyone would want, and surely aborting that baby in its early stages of development would be the better thing to do. Also, think of the number of children that would end up in care if abortion was banned. There are enough of them already, the banning of abortion would most definately increase this number, and the more children in care, the lower the quality would become. Where would they get the money to look after so many children? Our taxes? It would get rediculous, and there would be a lot of children out there wishing they had never been born. I do realise that there are problems with abortion, for example, the amount of people who have unsafe sex because they know they can either take the morning after pill or have an abortion is rediculous. But, I'd like to know that if the contraception i was using didn't work and I fell pregnant through no fault of my own, I would be very happy that I have the option to have an abortion. Also, when do you begin to class a fetus as a human? I personally would not think of it as a human untill about 12 weeks. It doesnt even enter the fetal stage untill the 11th week, surely abortion before this stage is not inhumane? If there was a contraception out there that was 100% effective, then this would be a more valid arguement. I'm young, and have dreams and aspirations that I could never fulfill if I became pregnant. If contraception can't garrentee that i won't get pregnant, I definately want the choice to have an abortion if i needed one. You're view seems to be very black and white, and you seem to dismiss the huge grey area that exists. Abortion exists for a reason and should not be banned
To your first point: What you are arguing for is the view known in German as; Lebensunwertes Leben or The Life Unworthy of Life. This was the philosophy that drove the Holocaust of Nazi Germany and the one currently underway here in America. To learn more about this follow this link Life_unworthy_of_life Why do I say this? Because you take a class of humans and then give reasons( very poor ones) of why they should not be allowed to live. In Nazi Germany they said; This human should not live because of X. And that this human should not live because of X. There is a direct correlation here and I hope you see it. When you get a chance also pick up the book From Darwin to Hitler by Dr. Richard Weikart Now to your question of At the moment of conception. Because at that point you now have a complete and distinct human DNA in the cell. There is no way around this; humans produce humans and dogs produce dogs. About a contraception that is 100% effective every time. It's known as abstinence. Practice it faithfully and you will never get pregnant or an STD. Fail to practice it and pay the price with your life and possibly that of your child's. And if you do have an unwanted pregnancy, Please consider adoption. Did you know that 1 out of every 6 couples are infertile. Do the math, that's a lot of couples who want to have children and can't. And I'm one of them. It cost me 14,000 dollars to have my daughter and it tears me up inside to know that some parents just discard their children like trash. There are thousands of us out here who are screaming; please don't kill it, we'll take it. You'd also be surprised to know the high number of Americans who adopt from over seas; and why do they? There aren't enough children to be adopted here because of abortion. You noted well that I see this issue as black and white. It's called moral clarity. When looking at evil I call it as it is; evil. Final thought: Were you ever a fetus? Because if you were, Then you have to acknowledge that if your mother would have had an abortion it would have ended your life, not something else, but your life. Think about that and look at it real hard because that's what abortion does; it ends the life of a human being in the early stages of development. And if you were born after 1972, I challenge you to consider yourself a Survivor of the Abortion Holocaust. 1/3 of your generation has been killed by abortion in America!
It's not "life unworthy of life", it's actually "POTENTIAL life!" Until the fetus can actually survive outside of the womb, it's a living organ like any other organ inside the woman's body. Once it reaches the stage of about 20 weeks when it should stand a slight chance of survival and maturing into a person, then it should be made illegal. But before that time, it only has the POTENTIAL, nothing more. A potential is just that.
Then why does it have it's own unique DNA? And what's the point of the fetal sack? Why all the complex systems to isolate the fetus from the mothers body? No serious doctor holds this position; the data doesn't remotely support it. Once it reaches the stage I did have it right when I said your view decides when a life is worthy of life and when a life is unworthy of life. You just said it right there. And here is a list of all the words you use in making this distinction; Until, Once, then, before. And about this notion of "potential life!" by all the standard definitions of life, it's alive and has been throughout, potentiality is a farce. And finally were do you get this arbitrary standard of survival and person hood? You see I don't discriminate; If it's human, and it is, then it deserves our full protection. The most dangerous place in America shouldn't be the womb.
Having its own DNA and all the systems that isolate it from the mother's body does not change the fact that it's completely a part of the mother. It will not amount to anything if it's detached from her.. You can think what you like, but at 20 weeks' gestation a fetus is still a person. The fact that society may be able to save it without its mother does not automatically make it a person. It's still so very far from actually entering personhood.. I don't know where you get your definition, but until it has a fully functional, self-sustaining biological system and is not attached to another life via the umbilical cord, I'm going to regard it as potential.. It's not arbitrary, it's fact. Me and a lot of other people hold this view. We make the laws to help us with our lives. At the moment, we don't actually need to ban abortion cos doing that doesn't actually help, and your argument that abortion equals murder is complete crap.
That's called discrimination based on level of dependency. It would seem to be the more compassionate thing to protect humans who are more dependent on others for their existence. You protect the weak, not exploit or kill them. I'm talking about human life, not personhood. Equivocating on terms is an attempt to ignore the obvious; were talking about human life. I don't know where you get your definition Oh I don't know, I just went to dictionary.com and got this definition and it doesn't discriminate on the basis of level of dependency like you do. What you call "potential" it calls life. In fact it makes no such distinction. Something is either alive or not. Also, I couldn't find a definition for potential life, only an article referring to it as a "a clever rhetorical trick" And since the parents of this life are human It's safe to say it's human. That ought to be obvious to any casual observer. Here is the standard definition of life; the condition that distinguishes organisms from inorganic objects and dead organisms, being manifested by growth through metabolism, reproduction, and the power of adaptation to environment through changes originating internally. Banning abortion wouldn't stop the killing of over 1500 humans a day? I hope your kidding because of course it would. That's why we ban things, to stop them. And yes, that would most certainly help all those innocent humans. Well, let's see. Something that was, by the standard definition of life, alive is now not alive, by the standard definition of life. So if something was alive we refer to it as dead. And that death came by willful intent, not an accident. In a court of law that's referred to as premeditated homicide. But since you can discriminate on the basis of level of dependency or level of development I guess that makes it OK, right? I don't think so. Call it what you will but a duck by any other name is still a duck.
No, ivelopment. Before it reaches a certain stage in development, it'd still only be a potential and it shouldn't have any rights whatsoever.. I'm not ignoring anything. I'm trying to clarify things for, apparently, a stubborn fool. A human potential life before a certain stage in its development shouldn't be afforded any rights whatsoever.. You're still dishing out BS and completely ignoring my points. Look up "potential" separately, then marry the 2 definitions together and then you should read this: I agree that it's life, I'm only making a distinction that it's potential. This is the case because even though it may have all the internal systems of a human life, they're in no condition to function until a certain stage is reached in its development. That's why it's a potential life. If you're incapable of putting the meanings of 2 separate words together, we should stop any further discussions.. Don't quotemine my arguments for your benefit. I said we make laws to help us with our lives. Tell me how banning abortion helps with our lives. Don't deviate. You think the planet is overpopulated now? You think the Earth's resources are being stretched now? Just mandate the saving of every single pregnancies and you'll see how our lives will be affected then.... Yes a duck is a duck, unless it's only a potential duck! ;)
People often try to personalize their pro-life argument by saying "imagine if YOUR mother had aborted YOU! YOU wouldn't be here!" Well, to that I say I wouldn't have cared, I wouldn't have had the capacity to care! But people believe in reincarnation might say that I'd be somebody else! Another person! Probably still to the same mother! Who knows.... But if at the time, she really didn't want to have me, then I say it's her choice.
Exactly. You wouldn't have cared, because you couldn't have cared. You would have never have had the chance to voice your opinion; to have your say as you do today.
So you agree with everything I just said, why then did you not click on the "support" link instead of the "Dispute" link?
Brilliant. That's it. Abortion is WRONG, and I don't know why some people can't get it through their thick skulls. Hmmm if you were a baby and were going to be born and you were aborted, you probably would care.
"if you were a baby, were going to be born and were aborted, you probably would care" this statement is all about "if". In reality, the fetus has no mental capacity to care about anything. Before it could survive outside of the mother's womb, it should be entirely the mother's choice, not society's. I believe this is about 20 weeks into the pregnancy.
We wouldn't care. We couldn't. As a fetus the natural drive humans have for survival really isn't there. The mental capacity just wouldn't exist to care.
Technically speaking, a fetus is not a human yet. Having an abortion is similar to wearing a condom. No baby is made, yet intercourse still happens.
A fetus is a stage of development. The genes are what determines what kind of fetus it is. So when a human being has an abortion she takes the life of a human fetus, not the fetus of a dog or cat, a human fetus. About the condom. Using a condom is what you do before fertilization to try and prevent fertilization. An abortion is what you do after fertilization has occurred to stop further growth of the product of fertilization. And when done on humans it ends the life of a human in the early stages of development. Them are the facts; abortions on humans ends the life of a human, using condoms prevents the fertilization of the human sperm and egg.
If wearing a condom only prevents the fertilization of an egg, doesn't it also stop the fetus from being made? There isn't much difference in ending it and not letting it start.
No, you are simply mistaken. A fetus is a stage of development in the life span of an animal. We happen to be talking about the life of a human and nothing else.
Let me clarify my position, since I misstated it. The first question that needs to be asked is " what kind of life is it?" If it is a human life then no reason for abortion is adequate. Therefore no further questions are needed. I find it rather disturbing that we want to have sex without commitments so badly that we are willing to kill the result of that sexual union. But isn't that just like human nature, everything is just fine until something conflicts with what we want and stands between us and what we desire. Then laws get broke, peace treaties ignored, property taken and people killed. But the most heinous crime is when we make laws to exonerate ourselves. When we call evil, good. We may be guiltless before the law but that doesn't mean we are not without real quilt. But praise be to God that He has provided a solution to the two greatest problems man faces, guilt and death. With God there is forgiveness, but not without great cost.
FYI The question is not who did or didn't do this or that. The question is should abortion be banned. I say it already is. We already have laws against murder; it's just that Roe vs Wade made a loop hole in the law and that ought to scare the hell out of any sane individual. Because with that ruling a whole class of people just became non persons and no longer protected under the Constitution. Abortion is the unjustified taking of a human life in the early stages of development and that is wrong. And if it is within in your power to stop it and you don't; you are just as guilty, regardless of your political affiliation.
1. The defining characteristic of a person is sapience. You need thought. You need self awareness. And to get those things you need a functioning brain. Since there is no coherent brain activity in early fetal development until AT LEAST 22 weeks we are most certainly not dealing with anything we could meaingfully call a person prior to that time. And since something like 97% of all abortions occur in that window and any occuring after it are almost always for reasons of medical necessity that alone should end this discussion. 2. EVEN IF we insisted on calling a fetus a person before then. Hell, even if we called it a person from the second it was conceived even though calling a few undifferentiated cells a "person" is insane... that still wouldn't be an arument for outlawing abortion since that requires declaring that the mother has no legal right to control over her own body. That it is superceded by another "person's" right to use her body for their own preservation. That is not a right that exists in our society. That right is possessed by NOBODY, and for good reason. I sure as hell cannot commandeer your body against your will to preseve my life. Nobody can walk up to you and force you to have surgery to give up a peice of your liver or some bone marrow because I need it to survive and my "right to life" trumps your right to have final say on what happens to your body. If we do that we define people as community property. Which is what outlawing abortion based on arguments that the mother doesnt have the right to say if her body gets used to carry a child to term would be doing. It's despicable. There is no justification fr outlawing abortion. Regulating it, yes. Placing reaosnable restrictions on late-term occurances, yes. Outlawing? Absolutely not. It must be legal.
1. that thing inside you is not a virus. It has the potential to grow into an adult human which is very precious. Oh, and it has a heartbeat at 5 weeks. So there are millions of babies killed with a heartbeat every year. how sad 2. I don't want to control your body. Rather i want to protect the growing human inside of you.
When does life start? That is the question. This debate will be over in a matter of minutes if someone came up with the answer right now. Evangelists would believe it starts at contraception while scientists debate that it is more accurately the development of the brain which is the seventh week of development. Of course any right minded person wouldn't put the science of birth in the hands of someone with no scientific expertise so it is generally accepted that the 7th is the week that a clump of cells turn into human. However how can any scientist or evangelist understand when a child gains a soul as the question is purely philosophical? The soul has been deemed integral or essential to consciousness, personality and every free thinking person has a soul which defines his existence as a human being rather than an imamate object. Plato says that a soul is a combination of various aspects. Mind, reason, emotion, appetite and desire. These characteristics define a soul. According to Platoan philosophy, if you were void of one of these aspects you are without soul. -An unborn child has a mind which allows it to make functional processes in its body but is not capable of and thought. Thought encompasses things such as imagination, ideas and reflection. A lot of people say dreams are proof of an unborn child’s thought but dreams don’t count because they are instinctive of a human slumber. It forces the brain to stay asleep as an inactive brain causes your brain to disable processing information from nervous system and other systems. This could ultimately cause you to loose consciousness all together so an automatic reaction is to wake up, it’s like a screensaver. -An unborn child has no reason; it has no choices to create over itself. No study has shown that an unborn child has ever been able to conduct its own decisions rather than its own instinctive actions. -It has no emotion, no joy, sadness or pity. (For all your religious nuts out there, pain is not an emotion) -Appetite is only created through its instinct to survive, I suppose it counts. -Unborn children have no desire. They do not want anything but their instinct to, live, eat, and kick stomach every now and then. There is no aspiration or defining motive. If anyone has any counters against these points I would like to hear what you have to say. However I do believe this is an erudite explanation of the creation of ones consciousness from a philosophical standpoint. When an unborn child gains all these aspects it moves from inanimate object to living, breathing, free-thinking human being. Ty.
"Life" please specify what you mean by the word "life". technically a fetus is indeed alive, a zygote is alive. Souls as supernatural things do not exist, or if you would prefer the less strong statement are not falsifiable or observable. Free will does not exist, it is non-sensical and thus to say a unborn child has never conducted its own decisions only instinctive actions is to say it has done only what any of us can do. Before conception, during it, after it etc Life never wasn't during a "successful pregnancy". 2 haploids of two different beings came together, forming a third being. keep in mind a being is distinct from person.
1. It's not a person. Abortion to me is no different than jizzing in a rag, sure there is potential that those cells could have made a person, but they aren't now and that they never will shouldn't bother anyone in the least. 2. Given that there is 0 proof that the cluster of cells has any type of self-awareness, a preponderance of proof that the cluster of cells doesn't have self-awareness, then it is the case of a person doing something to their own body. People should be allowed to do whatever they like with there own body. 3. Even if abortion were illegal, there is evidence that illegality has never stopped women from getting an abortion if they want one. Making it illegal would not save these imaginary people anyway, but it would kill scores of women who decide to get an abortion in a dirty basement instead of a clean hospital.
Who are any of you to decide what is right for a pregnant woman? When a woman has been raped and impregnated she doesn't deserve to have the choice? So in this wonderland were abortion is illegal ... is it that great? We would have children being born into homes where they are unwanted, women aborting themselves through god-awful ways, or adoption homes are flooded with unwanted children. Sound like a perfect world to you? It doesn't to me.
Abortion is not murder because a fetus is not a human. Therefore, abortion is legal
What makes a fetus not a human?
What makes a human a human? What makes you think that your definition is accurate? A human can think, has some level of autonomy, and generally is able to survive on its own. Human is the biology, the culture, the history, shared by us all. A foetus in its early weeks cannot think, cannot take care of itself at all, can't make choices. Why would you impose upon women the inability to remove foetuses that aren't individuals?
It moves and has to be provided with nourishment and protection from the mothers womb. So it is not human? How is it not living? Thats like saying a fetus of a dog will not become a dog. Seriously? Please explain..... I really want to know your ideas. I think every woman and anyone that's for abortions, that has a voluntary abortion should have every reproduction organ removed from their body . My Aunt cannot have children and she wants one more than anything and some women are throwing them away like they were the fetus's are trash. Why won't they just have the baby and give it to someone like my aunt.
Do you realise that most abortions (over ninety percent) occur before the foetus even has brain tissue? Think about that for a moment. Everything that makes us what we are comes from our brain, but what's aborted in the vast majority of cases has NO brain. In many cases what's aborted is a microscopic bit of cells. This isn't the same as killing infants or babies, so you need to learn more about it and divorce yourself from that mindset.
its still taking nourishment from the mother, it still moves. I am a mom, do you know how i would feel now(after holding her) if i would've taken the alternative route? If its taking nourishment from its mother, it's not quite a human being yet. If it has a brain, that makes the issue more complex. Childbirth was a decision that you took, it worked for you. You need to understand that what works for doesn't work for many women.
Even if it doesn't have a brain, my belief is that the PERSON still has a soul. The soul is what gives the PERSON LIFE The bible says once you are conceived the chosen PERSON has a given soul that the Lord has chose for you. Please do not argue with my spiritual beliefs, i have chose to believe in God and the law protects that.
it is a human being, its not a human person. these concepts are distinct, or at least need to be.
I use the definition that it is human as an egg, zygote, and foetus until it is between 14 and 20 weeks old. At that point it is an open question whether it can be described as a person, or a human. Before then, it is tissue without a necessary nervous system.
That is why i am against the healthcare reform. My taxes WILL NOT pay for the MURDER of an unborn child. I refuse....
Should not the philosophy behind laws and Laws themselves be consistent? If abortion is justified by the lack of sapience. Then could not the same argument be used to justify such things as dumpster babies, killing of severally mentally disabled people, people in a coma or any one who doesn't demonstrate sapience after birth, even during a temporary period like sleep? after all you will eventually demonstrate sapience when you wake up, which would be the same argument given stating that a fetus will eventually develop a brain and demonstrate sapience. well sleeping your moments are similar to the kicking a fetus may have, they are not a demonstration of sapience. The exact definition of sapience is interestingly not needed to show that a fetus doesn't have it. it simply needs to be shown that sapience requires a well enough developed brain and that a fetus lacks a developed enough one and thus lacks sapience no matter what is to be said of further defining of the concept of sapience. If the same criteria is applied towards organisms with developed brains then there are problems. Sapience is not always active, consciousness shuts down, comes in various degrees etc do these problems not amount to anything? If someone came to me and needed one of my organs. I would not be the cause of them needing my organ. I would not be liable for their situation. A mother in the majority of causes is liable for the situation. She is undeniably creating human life(which is indeed distinct from human person) only to destroy it. combine that with the complications above and this seem to be quite muddled. So the question seems to me to be more of weather our laws and philosophies behind them should be consistent and if they are not then it is not principles but rather utility they are based on. In such a case we should just say we allow abortion because it suits us, not that it is allowed because of some philosophical system or principled decision.
Abortion is not murder. I never forgot that. I was attacking the argument from sapience not debating weather it is ethical to deny the existence of a hypothetical being. your commentary isn't relative to what i posted. it is ethical to deny someone's or rather some human being's existence before they exist. It is ok to wear a condom. any such person being stopped from existing is just hypothetical. A fetus isnt a person, it is a human being. however just what the hell is a person? abortion gets down to questions that have been disputed for hundreds of years, and to this day don't possess satisfactory answers. A fetus is undeniably alive by the way, it just doesn't demonstrate sapience and can not. Expanding the scope of the argument leads to problems, showing that the argument from sapience is only valid with "but", "ifs" etc which would contradict the argument. Is a baby born less then one day ago really sapient? if not, why not be able to put it in a dumpster. It does not have a choice of its own, and does not seem very "person" like. Thus it fits the criteria and people should have the ability to kill it, for it is very dependent on a care taker(s) and what right does it have to impose on anyone? This is just one of many examples.
To be honest, yes it is in some way "murder," but what is the other solution? The mother wants to abort because of some specific reason, let it be because the unborn child is deformed, it was a rape child, or it was just an unwanted child(by mistake when drunk and such)... Tell me honestly if you got an wanted child you would keep it because you think it is "murder". most people abort because they don't have the money to support that unborn child. What is better? Letting the child into a world of sh*t or spare it of what could have come. Why would you take the risk? Because if you do take the risk then and it turns out bad then it wouldn't only hurt the child's life, but yours too, and you families lives/economy. And in the long Run it will cost the country they live in a lot of money because if they can't provide someone has to get them money... Who'll do that? Most likely that state and their family members...
Also, the central nervous system begins functioning around week 4. Most abortions are performed around week 8. Think the fetus can't feel anything? Think again.
This debate's URL is "abortion_30" which, I believe, indicates that it is the 30th debate to bear the title "Abortion". Next time, run a search and see how many like debates have already been made. Abortion violates the NAP in that it causes harm to another human, and so I cannot support it. As well, I cannot comprehend how anybody can think that their own choice trumps the right to the life of another; I am alive, if another life is alive because of me, but can be terminated by me at a moment's notice, in what universe is it acceptable for me to put my own personal desires ahead of that of the other life? It is a different story if you choose to kill yourself, but to choose to kill somebody else... That's simply ludicrous to me.
Is an acorn a tree? Is an egg a chicken? No. The acorn has a chance to become a tree, but it is not. Is a fetus a human? No. Science has blatantly proven this so many times that I truly question the opposing side's intellectual abilities; abortion is not murder. It's the termination of a collection of cells that cannot survive outside of the womb because it isn't a human. Can you feed a 4 week old fetus? Watch it cry? No.
There are other ways the child can get taken care of.
Abortion is killing an innocent child. they dont even have a chance to live before they die. Their parents kill them before they have a chance at life.
Abortion may be murder, it may not be. I personally don't care. I think abortion is an option that should always be kept open. I wouldn't want the burden of raising a child I can't raise, and I wouldn't want anyone to force me or anyone else to. And before someone tells me adoption is another option, I personally wouldn't like always wondering who is raising my child, and if they're raising them okay. Or how I would want them to.
I would rather a fetus is killed, then for a child to have a horrible life and get neglected by their parents.
But who is to say the child may not grow up to be the next Stephen Hawking, or even just a stable, healthy individual. Yes, there is also a chance that they would have a horrible life. But by killing the fetus, you remove ANY chance at all. It would be like the staff on the Titanic walking through the ship and killing every passenger aboard, rather than giving them a chance in the lifeboats or even in the open water (6 survived in the water by the way......Bet they were glad they were given the chance.)
I personally don't consider the fetus to be living. At least not in a way that matter. And it's considerably different to kill someone who already is living a life, than a fetus that simply has the possibility to live a life.
A women should be able to choose what happens with her body, especially concerning abortion and babies. Not because I support abortion, but what if you were the child of a mom? What if that mom only had you grudgingly because she was forced to have you, abortions being outlawed? Would you really want to grow up unloved? A child who's own mother would have aborted you? Worse than an accident, you are a person whom the people you are supposed to love, and are supposed to love you would rather have had you dead than given birth to you. In reality, it's not that bad, but forcing a mother to give birth to an unwanted child is cruel, and with the human population this high, with plenty of orphans already, why make more? Why go to the trouble and the pain for the mother, and the child, the entire family, and the whole world, when abortion could be an option? I support safe sex and planned pregnancy, I think abortion is murder, as is war or any human killing another human, but killing does happen. Every time you eat, you are eating something that was killed, plant or animal. If it reduces pain in the world, then you should be able to abort.
Seek the truth, not what you want the truth to be. That's why I'm not religious. Which religion? All say to believe, yet why? Must I believe or can I just not believe? It's why I follow science and logic. To me, to be logical is to reduce pain in the world, increase happiness, and gain knowledge, while being safe and helping people. That is why I must be pro-life AND pro-choice. I cannot force others to my opinion, just as others cannot force me, because it is only an opinion. Normally, I am against killing, but a fetus is a lot different than a fully grown human, or even a child. Anyways, I try to aim for objective truth in an objective world, so unless you believe in the supernatural, or things that can't be proven, my opinion, I've noted is almost always 100% correct, or consistent with my logic/morals. Happiness, freedom and knowledge are important to me, and on a debate forum, they should be to you too! Have a nice day. =D
Does it not go against all reason that person A should have the right to kill person B, if person A finds person B's continued existence to be inconvenient? A woman may have a right to her body, but by choosing abortion she's affecting the rights of another persons body as well - the child's. And mental trauma from the abortion is no fitting punishment for murder. We don't let people freely walk away from unwillingly killing other people just because they feel bad about it.
This question has far greater implications. Are there such things as inalienable rights - human rights? The right to life for example? If there are, then there are two possibilites: 1. Humans obtain their inalienable rights purely by being a human being. From the moment of conception, a distinct human being, with its own unique genetic signature, has been given rise - thus from the moment of conception a human being starts to exist and as such, with conception the inalienable rights are also given to the human merely for existing as a human being. 2. We start bartering and haggling. When does a human get rights, what rights, which humans should get them etc etc. But if we conclude with this option, then there is no real reason to limit ourselves to the unborn - Nazi Germany is a very modern example of a nation haggling with these inalienable rights on born human beings. So first of all, we need to see what implications rise from the views and ideas to which we have attached ourselves to. Now that you've thought about these implications, lets look at abortion from an honest perspective - it's the termination of the life of a developing human being for the sake of perserving the convenience and the satisfaction of another person. This is against all reason. Convenience does not justify the termination of another human's life - murder. The parents are generally always responsible for the creation of the fetus, so they should have the moral obligation to support the life of that fetus. If they do not want the child, they can give him/her up for adoption - adoption is not some myth. We must also strive for the creation of institutions that would take care of unwanted children in a loving, productive environment. Murder is not an acceptable alternative for a civilized nation. Given the fact that pregnancy lasts 9 months, one needs to ask themselves - Is murder justified by temporary inconvenience? For the sake of comparison, think of the USA, 1800 - the question of slavery. Some of you may object, but the general rethoric at the time was completely the same - Blacks are not fully human, thus they have no rights ; We should not force our opinions on other people, lets respect our freedom to choose ; We are not ready for such an extensive protection of human rights, we need to go step by step etc etc. Nowaydays we laugh and ridicule such arguments as we see it self-evidently that slavery is immoral and I'm convinced that 100 years from now, we'll be seeing abortion in the same light. As abortion does not affirm to my vision of what an ethical, civilized nation should be like - I'm forced to subscribe to the pro-life position.
What about adoption? If you don't want the child, give it up for adoption.
1. In all instances abortion is legal except extreme circumstance we know scientifically beyond doubt (despite christian blitz misinformation campaign on the subject) that the cluster of cells is not self-aware and is not capable of feeling pain. 2. Nowhere in the U.S. is abortion legal after the 3rd trimester unless that cluster of cells is known to have birth defects which will kill it or the mother upon birth (again despite christian harassment and even murder of abortion doctors and their bullshit pictures of babies being sucked into a vacuum they make up and spread online like a disease). 3. No one is forcing anyone to have an abortion. If one side is not forcing one to abort, what gives another a right to force another not to abort? If you don't want an abortion don't have one, and if you think it's a sin let god handle it, he's like all powerful or something right? He doesn't need your help asshole. 4. Making abortion illegal never in the history of the world has been shown to stop abortions from happening. 5. Making abortions illegal has been shown to force rape victims and young girls, many of whom are practically babies themselves, to seek dangerous means for having an abortion, resulting in more deaths. Basically in their self-righteous single-minded inability to feel the least bit of empathy for actual living women, amidst their floating misconceptions of what a fetus is, pro-lifers would actually kill more "people" than save.
1. My fingernails and hair have human DNA as well. 2. Inconsequential. 3. It is well-established that it is not murder by the scientific community. It is only misguided feelings which insist it is murder. It is not though. 4. No, the purpose of laws is not to punish. That is a misconception. The purpose of law is to guarantee freedoms, rehabilitate, and remove dangerous individuals from society. 5. You are stating the same boring points cited over, and over, and over by others on all of these debates. You've not said anything new.
1. Your fingernails and hair do not make up the whole of you as a human. Without your hair or fingernails you would survive. On the contrary, abortion kills the entire individual organism. 2. That whole issue is inconsequential. 3. Science is silent on the issue of morality. However science does agree that the fetus has an individual genetic code and fits into the biological definition of life. It is an individual human by all biological standards. It is in no way a part of the mother, it just depends on the mother for survival (and so are children outside the womb). Because of this it is deserving of all human rights everyone else has. Unless you can show it is not an individual human or it is not alive, anything else is superfluous. 4. You're just stating the positive side of the coin whereas I said the negative. 5. You're refusing to answer the basic data over and over. Please share how a human fetus is not alive or how it is not an individual with a unique genetic code.
1. Just as my a human, so too a fetus does not make up the whole of a human. They do have equal feelings, emotions and understanding on the matter though. 3. It is in every way part of the mother. It is a cluster of cells with no feelings, emotion of ability to be self-aware growing within her. And wether it is alive is not the point at all. It is not even close to the point. The point is whether it is self-aware and capable of feeling, which it definitely, without any doubt, is not. 4. No, you're imagining a human where there is none. I'm giving you fact you're giving me your personal misguided feelings. 5. My claim is not based on genetic code or whether it's living. It's based on being self-aware. Gentetic code and living have nothing to do with the matter as I clearly showed in the examples of hair, nails, insects and moss. I'll make you a deal, when you have the omniscient ability to know exactly what every female and fetus on earth is thinking and feeling and you can prove to me you have this ability, then if fetuses stop dying of natural causes all on their own magically, I'll agree with your self-righteous nosy bullshit.
1. At this point in the baby's life, it does. The fetus is an individual human. A fetus is just a term for a body in the womb of a mother. 2. It is a collection of human cells with a different genetic code than the mother. It is alive and an individual. Again there are people born who are never self-aware, some who never feel, so on your view are they not people? The fetus may be dependent on the mother for survival, but so is a newborn, so is an infant, and so is a child. These are all different stages of development of an individual human being. It's not like the fetus is an organ of the mother - it is an individual human life. 3. By all biological definitions it's an individual humans. I could say you're giving me your own personal misguided feelings; it gets us nowhere. Let's stick with medical facts. 4. Again hair and nails are not individual humans - they're part of you. In the case of abortion it is killing the entire organism, akin to poisoning you to death. Not your nails or hair, but your entire self. If self-awareness is the test of personhood, again that advocates the killing of the retarded, comatose, and senile elderly. Moss and insects are a red herring. You're getting too emotional with the argument. I don't have to be omniscient to know that it is wrong to murder innocent human beings because they inconvenience you. The fetus is a separate human life and deserves protection if any human deserves protection. Also you don't make a distinction between killing something and that thing dying of natural causes? Really?
This is retarded. It's not a sentient being. It is the woman's body. It is none of your business what another does with their body. You want to justify forcing your morality on others, and are reaching for quazi-logic to do it. There is no logic in it though. Only religious superstition. One of the reasons your religion is so evil and dangerous when weilded by most of you, you cannot even see your own totalitarian views on morality should you be given enough power in any situation to control others, and you will literally make-up bullshit like your argument to justify it. "It's alive" - yeah I know, but not sentient. "Human DNA" - yeah, I know but not sentient. "Your changing the argument" - still not sentient "Stick to the facts" - nope, still not sentient. It's silly. If god doesn't like it let him come tell people otherwise. Until then tell your fellow christians to stop with the abortion doctor death threats and scaring girls on their way to clinics. Also you don't make a distinction between killing something and that thing dying of natural causes? Really? lmao. You're not? If god is all powerful he's killing more fetuses than every abortion doctor combined.
It's not a sentient being. I never disputed this. I asked if, on your view, the retarded, senile, and comatose are all in the same boat as fetuses as none of them are self-aware and some are not feeling. It is the woman's body. It's a separate human life form inside the woman's body, but it in no way is a part of her body. In the same way a splinter is in my body but not a part of my body. The fetus is not an organ of the mother. It is none of your business what another does with their body. It is in the case of depriving someone else of their rights, like murder. Only religious superstition. I haven't once made a religious statement here. I've only given statements from biology. One of the reasons your religion is so evil and dangerous when weilded by most of you, you cannot even see your own totalitarian views on morality should you be given enough power in any situation to control others, and you will literally make-up bullshit like your argument to justify it. Cool red herring and ad hominem. If god doesn't like it let him come tell people otherwise. Until then tell your fellow christians to stop with the abortion doctor death threats and scaring girls on their way to clinics. Only if you actually answer the one question I've asked and stick with biology instead of emotion. If god is all powerful he's killing more fetuses than every abortion doctor combined. You really enjoy ruddy fish. So can I get an answer to my question up top now?
1. We are all just a cluster of cells. There are some people who are never self-aware due to mental diseases. There are some people who don't feel pain because of neurological disorders. This hardly disqualifies them from humanity. Of course it doesn't disqualify them from being considered human. But it does mean that they are not persons, i.e. they do not possess the essential characteristics of personhood, which are rationality, autonomy and self-consciousness. 2. I agree that in life-or-death situations, the doctors have to make a call to save the mother or the baby. This is atypical, however, and only happens in about 2-3% of all cases. But you haven't stated whether abortion, in such unfortunate circumstances, are right or wrong. 3. The issue is not whether or not people are forced to have abortions. The issue is whether or not abortion is murder. If abortion is murder, then we have a problem. We should not think the legalization of murder is ok just because no one is forcing us to murder others. On the contrary, this is an issue of whether you would consider abortion as murder or not. Furthermore, you yourself seem to think that this issue is paramount to the debate since you went on to talk about the legalisation of murder and used that as an analogy. 4. This applies to murder, rape, theft, and every other crime. Of course it won't stop some people from doing it, but it will allow for law enforcement to punish for committing crimes. It will also help to educate youth on what is morally acceptable and what is morally horrid. My question to you is: is abortion morally acceptable? 5. This issue is moot if a fetus is an individual human life. We shouldn't legalize murder to make it less hazardous to the murderer. Besides this rape is never the fault of the baby, so how does anyone have a right to kill it? You seem to forget that rape is also never the fault of the victim . With this being true, how can you deny the victim/mother-to-be the right to make choices concerning her own body if it is not her fault in the first place?
So on your view, then, it would be ok to kill these humans because they are not people? The short answer is "yes", but the long answer would have to be "no". What about babies outside of the womb who are newborn? They lack rationality, autonomy, and self-consciousness. No, they don't. According to the OED, autonomy is defined as "a. The condition of being controlled only by its own laws, and not subject to any higher one. b. Organic independence." A baby that is born do have autonomy. Self-consciousness is defined, according to the OED, as "Consciousness of one's own identity, one's acts, thoughts, etc." As long as one has knowledge of what one is doing, he/she is said to possess self-consciousness. A baby that is born can said to have self-consciousness. 2. I think it's morally neutral in these cases. If between a rock and a hard place, where the doctor has to make a life-or-death call, it would be morally permissible (not good or evil) to do so. It between "a rock and a hard place" is not the same as moral neutrality. Furthermore, morally permissible is not morally neutral. You are contradicting yourself here. 3. I think you misread it because your response agrees with me. The issue is whether or not abortion is murder. Legality and morality are separate, of course, but legality should flow out of morality. Yes, it seems like I have misread your statement. I apologise for that. And I agree with what you have said about legality and morality. 4. No, except in life-or-death cases as stated above. However, you haven't provided any good arguments to exclude all the other cases from being morally permissible. 5. But neither is it the fault of the child. It's unfortunate, but the mother being wronged in no way makes it morally acceptable for her to thereby wrong the baby. First, the fetus is neither a "child" nor a "baby". Thus, your entire argument is moot. Second, while I agree that the injustice accrued to someone is not justification for that person to wrong any one else, you are assuming that the fetus has the same rights as the mother. As I have said, since the fetus is not a person, it would be fallacious to accrue the same rights to a fetus as you would any other person.
Give me a few more years and I suspect I'll be 99% pro-life as my opinion continues to evolve the older I get. At this point I believe it should be rare... only in the first trimester and only once... not to be used as a form of birth control. As for rape and incest, I don't know if I will ever believe that abortion shouldn't be allowed in those cases.
I am prochoice when the mother's life is in danger and the baby is to young to survive.
It's funny how people have abortions just because they can't be responsible enough to use protection. If the person was raped or could die from the pregnancy, I can understand. But honestly, people should never get an abortion if they are just too irresponsible. Makes me sick
As a woman who does not hold a religious stance on this but rather a personal experience stance, I think my argument holds a lot of water. I had an abortion. I regret it deeply. I am older now and realize how selfish of a decision it was. I think because we can't see or hold or converse with the life, it is easy to dismiss but, I ALSO, almost did it again, 3 years later. I had two children already and had been basically tricked into a pregnancy I did not want. My boys were older, I had my life together and did not want another child. The issue was pushed by my partner and I was given an ultimatum. I got pregnant and he left 8 weeks into it. I was backed against a wall, scared, confused. How would I care for 3 children alone? I made an appointment and drove to Las Vegas ( hours and hours from where I lived. ) Once there I broke down in the parking lot and drove all the way home. I went through with the pregnancy and gave birth to a gorgeous little girl, met a guy that has been her dad for the last 5 years and I am reminded everytime I look at her, that the only thing that separated her from death was my unwillingness to walk up a flight of stairs. She almost wasn't here... so close. She also reminds me of the who isn't here because of a selfish decision I made. I like how so many people forget about adoption as an option...just like I did. Denying life a chance...
Life is defined scientifically as any organism containing most or all of the following qualities: 1. Homeostasis - regulation of internal environment 2. Organization - composed of one or more structured cells 3. Metabolism - able to transform food into energy and use it 4. Growth - increasing in size or complexity 5. Adaptation - ability to change over time in response to environment 6. Response to stimuli - reacting to outside objects (recoiling when poked, etc) 7. Reproduction - ability to produce more organisms From the moment of conception, the new cell has all of these attributes. It fits into the definition of life. The new cell also has a unique genetic code not found in the mother. Therefore, given the definition of life and the fact that the new life has a differing genetic code from its mother we can conclude that it is a separate human being in early stages of development. As a separate human being it has the same worth and rights as any other human being. If this is true no other arguments matter. Size, stage of growth (children are less developed than adults, are they less than human?), and location do not matter at all. If it is an individual human being, it has all the rights and protections of all other human beings. Killing this life is tantamount to murder.
1. This is not always the case. There are some forms of retardation in which they never achieve these. I personally know of one little girl who has massive brain damage and will never be able to fit your description. People in comatose (if we follow your definition of personhood) lose their personhood upon going comatose - they cannot gain knowledge, exercise wisdom, love others, find purpose, or integrate into society. Now the incredible irony of all of this is that the fetus can do all of these things given the chance. If on your view these people are persons because they have the potential of doing these things, how is the fetus not a person having the equal potential of doing these things? 2. "Reproduction" in the sense of simple life just means the ability to replicate oneself in some manner. It's not sexual reproduction, no, but that's not what the definition refers to. Otherwise single-celled organisms which reproduce asexually wouldn't be considered alive. Clarification: I am against abortion in all but life-or-death cases. At that point I think the doctor needs to make the call and save either the mother or the baby. The moral landscape is such at that point that it's permissible to take action one way or the other because the doctor is sworn to do everything he can to keep his patient alive.
Hello abortion debate number 9374638382943739393... I've said this all too many times; fetus is not conscious, no different to killing an ant, own personal choice, blah blah blah... Read one of the other billion abortion debates for my opinion.
I am for abortion but not if it is late-term, the things I feel that must be allowed is abortion after rape, abortion if the woman is not going to take care of her child, abortion if the woman's life is in danger, abortion if the baby is going to be disabled(if they wish) .
A fetus is NOT a human, just a mass﻿ of tissue Abortion is safer than childbirth The number of abortions are relatively small Nobody has the right to impose their morals on others A woman should be able to control her own body Abortion must be kept legal, especially for all the rape and incest pregnancies If abortion is outlawed women will be forced to go to back-alley abortion clinics Aborting an unwanted fetus reduces the number of abused children
By that definition, so you are you. So am I. Abortion is safer than childbirth HA! In the same way that murder is safer than living. The number of abortions are relatively small The number of murders are relatively small. Should we no legalize murder, rape, and theft? Then why do we have laws against murder? child rape? torture? assault? grand larceny? etc.? To say that a fetus is merely an extension of its parent needs some substantiation. Fair enough. Should this have a bearing on its endorsement as legal by the state? HA! In the same way that mass genocide prevents accidental deaths.
your heart is a mass of tissue so why dont you suck that out and chuck it in the bin
And so is yours. All is fair in love and war. There is no need to be so sarcastic and rude for such a serious debate. So stop being a troll, pull your head out of your pants and think straight. ABORTION = MINIATURE GENOCIDE.
A fetus is NOT a human, just a mass﻿ of tissue No, we have a mind No, it's less dangerous to abort than give birth, wth^^ Fair enough Those are not morals, morals are more of opinions, these are really not opinions A fetus is like a parasite, should a mother have no choice? Yes, it could cause a lot of crime, which the state doesn't want, and it would be more dangerous HA! I suppose...
No, we have a mind Define mind? If by mind you mean sentience, fetuses are sentient after 12 weeks. No,^ Again, in the same way that mass genocide reduces the number of traffic accidents. I don't understand your argument. She had a choice. She CHOSE to have sex, knowing full well the possible ramifications of such an action. Yes, Of course criminalizing an act will increase the criminal offenses of that act. But that is not an argument in and of itself.
That is a wonderful answer and I 100% agree. Even though they are not technically "alive" yet, so to say; it is still killing a baby. All those masses of babies killed is like premature genocide and should be illegal by mind, spirit and by law.
The number of abortions are relatively small Sorry, I just wanted to clarify. (I'm very pro-choice). this like it's a positive thing that the number of abortions had is relatively small. prior to that Why would you want less abortions if the doctor is simply aborting tissue?
Abortion is a way to prevent more poor families, suffering children, and used as back up when birth control fails. I don't think anyone who used protection in sex should be saddled with a child. A child is a lot of work, and if you don't want the child then you both suffer for the next eighteen years.
If you were even considering abortion, why would you even want to have sex and get pregnant in the first place if there is a possibility of conceiving and getting pregnant? Makes no sense. It's just illogical and stupid. DUH! :P
Um, have you ever had sex? lol It's kind of fun. Not too mention it's great for relationships. Sex isn't just for reproducing anymore. We've made it where we can have sex for pleasure. It's narrow-minded to just think of sex just as reproducing. It's also no fun if you think of it just like that.
A "thing" inside of a women stomach (cuz we all know that's where the come from) is not a true human being until it comes out into the world. Therefore science should have the ability to complete the task. There is no moral issue here. The problem I and most of you should have is the stupid teenagers who have sex think they have an easy way out. They should have to pay the consequences for their actions. I am still for abortion but there is one big problem I have with it.
abortion should be a womans choice. once a certain time period has passed threw the pregnacny then it should not occur. but why bring a child into the world that someone does not want. just for it to be put in an adoption home to spend the rest of its life knowing that mommmy and daddy didnt want them. in my opinion its way better to prevent the suffering & over population.
I'm confused. Why would you want it to occur more frequently?????? People don't really choose to abort a child, they resort to it.
I am against abortion because it is practically kill the baby inside the womb. And that is a innocent child in the womb if you decide to abort the child you are basically committing murder and destroying a innocent life.
Abortion is wrong sure there are instances that people think that it is right but it never is you are taking a life away even if the baby is not alive yet you take away that oppertunity away if you say for instance get raped or the condom breaks give the baby up for adoption but still be apart of its life I have noticed that the people that say abortion is right are alive and their parents didnt go through an abortion
First of all, do you know what a comma or period is? Because your whole argument is just one huge sentence... Break it up. It's not right even if the mother will die during childbirth? Or if it is a fact that the child will be born with a disorder that will make it suffer all it's life and die in only about ten years after birth? It's still wrong then? Some people are against adoption in the same way you are against abortion. They simply can't go through with it. And you can't always be apart of it's life once you put it up for adoption, nor do some people want to.. This is the stupidest argument ever, if any parent did then it would irrelevant. And I have, on many occasions, which my mother had had another abortion when I was conceived. She suffered greatly by deciding to keep me and my twin brother, and I wish she had simply aborted us and lived a better life for herself.
I believe that abortion cannot be justified because it is killing an innocent human being. Every child is a precious and unique gift from God. We have no right to destroy this. Moreover, United Nations declaration says children have a right to protected before as well as after birth! And if it is not possible for your to have a baby, due to shortage of money or time... Nowadays many couples would adopt unwanted babies.
From the time of conception, a child is alive and to abort a child is killing the child. and if you are aborting because of medical reasons. you should let the child die naturally inside the mother. the dead child will then be absorbed by the mothers body.
Abortion is not advised as it dangers the new life of new humans living on Earth.
There are already too many humans living on Earth. We don't need more.
It's the girl's fault for not taking birth controls, having the guy use a condom, or using any other type of protection when having sex. I know that women have their own rights, but if they didn't use any kind of protection, and are underage, then it's their fault and responsibility. I only agree to abortion if the women was raped and then became pregnant, other than that I am against it.
well, heres what i think. its ok to abort an unborn child because it is the parents decision to do so. now, once the baby is actually a living creature in your stomach besides just the fetus, it maybe then could be considered illegal since you are killing a baby, not a fetus. so say the fetus develops into an actuall baby at, i dont know 6 months? am i right, wrong? but when its an actuall baby and then you abort, then it may be considered murder, so.. all right i'll just break it down abortion of a fetus:legal abortion of a baby: possibly wrong
Abortion should be legal as it is the mother's decision to kill said baby, yet in saying that they should have sufficient help to make this decision
i believe that abortion should be legal because all an abortion is, is preventing a baby from being born into the world. if thats the case, then what are we doing by using birth control or condoms. we are preventing a baby from being born into the world. its also the mother's choice, and the father if hes still around. and what about those who are raped and unfortunate with a baby of that specific person.
this is true. but there is also the fact that why should a baby that nobody wanted be born, when the parents dont want them to be around? what if it was a mistake? so many emo's are in the world because they couldnt be aborted all in all...abortion should be legal
Should abortion be legal? It was like asking should murdering another person should be legal? I can't see the point why it should be legal in any sense. Abortion = murder. Why? Because you are planning to take the life of another human. Don't tell me that fetuses are not babies because in every single way they are. And if they are human they have all the right to live. You can have them be adopted if you are not ready with the child. Just don't take their first right away from them.
Abortion should be illegal.Because it not fair to those babies that are being killed for the fault of those adult and I think that that everybody deserve chance to life .
Abortion should be consider illegal. it is not the unborn child's fault that they was to be given life. the ones who conceded the child are at fault. even if the child is unborn the child should still have every other right to live as any other human being for the child is a human being too. and it would be murder and disgrace to kill a child that has yet to be born and to kill a innocent child who has convicted no crime unless you call being alive and wanting to live a crime, then in that case everyone in the human race has committed a crime.
Fuck No, how can you possibly think that it's the women's right to choose, the fetus is a living being that is growing and was created by God what right do you have to destroy what he has made good. You just should not have had sex in the first place why don't you be a little more responsible next time you go out and act like giant whore you stupid bitch. What the hell is your problem it's a human life, it's your own child for gods sake da hell. May god have mercy on your soul because I sure as hell wouldn't just consider your self lucky that there is a god that is more forgiving then I am.
It really is the mother's decision. If she isn't wanting to take care of it who will? Yes the father maybe... but what if your raped, what if you didnt want the baby and the husband altered the birthcontrol pills into something else. Yes you could put it into an adoption agency, but what if they grow up wonderign why there parents gave them up? They would feel like crap thinking that there parents hated them, and be suicidel. No one deserves the live of bouncing around in foster homes, thinking no one loves them. They may get into a caring family but do you know how many kids get into crappy situations? It is the persons decisions, we souldnt have a law saying this is a bad thing to do. Its a moral and a value we all have and we all have different views. why should we care about what other people do with there lives. especally people we dont even know.
im sorry but i would much rather have my baby in heaven then on earth if i couldn't take care of it. i don't understand why we feel that we get to dictate what other people can do with their bodies. different people have different morals and we can't tell them what to think or feel. it's not right to tell people what to think or feel then they aren't who they are anymore.
Most adopted children do not become suicidal. they might wonder about their biological parents but i wouldnt say they think that they hated them. giving up your child for adoption is an act of love rather than hate
Why should you kill a innocent baby? That is exactly what abortion is. Even though the mother does not want the baby, she should still have it. Most of the people who want an abortion and never go through with it, actually say they would regret killing the baby. Should America become "I get to do whatever I want to just because I can"?
When a fetus hasnt been born yet it isnt a person to me. If somethign cannot live without something for it to hook up to for life support it isnt alive. It isnt alive until it is born. It could be way more hazardous to the mother than the child.
It's about freedom - a woman's freedom to control her own body, and a couple's freedom to decide when is a good time to bring a child into the world.
Simply to play devil's advocate...."its about freedom-a woman's freedom to control her own body". However, once she becomes pregnant...is it only her body then? Her body is supporting another life so one can make the argument that she is then sharing her body with another being and it is no longer her own.
Imagine this scenario: A woman is walking to her house, all of a sudden a man grabs her from an alley. He rapes her. Should the woman be forced to have the baby of the man who raped her? Even if the baby was put up for adoption, the woman would go through all the pain of having a baby, and the medical fees, and the baby might not be adopted.
your stupid. obviously a person can choose what they want to do it should be up to the mother or father to decide what they would like to do with their unborn child
No it isn't stupid. A person shouldn't be allowed to kill a future child. They are willing enough to create the child and I believe that they need to own up to their own responsibilities. It was their choice to tango and they need to pay up for it. God wanted the child there for a reason. There is always adoption as an option!
Even if a zygote or early term fetus was a person (which it isn't)... And even if that person had all the rights that other people have (which it doesn't).... I sure as hell don't have the right to commandeer someone else's body against their will for nine months to keep myself alive and neither does a fetus. The only way to argue that a woman doesn't have the right to terminate a pregnancy she doesn't want is to declare her body to be a piece of property that she doesn't have the right to final say over the use of. And it's just that simple.
At what point do you believe the zygote becomes a "person"? Also, are you meaning to say that the fetus purposefully "commandeered" the mother's body? I don't believe the baby had a choice which body it wanted to inhabit.
The easy answer is when it is born. The more complicated answer is when it has developed its brain.
yeah so people have the right to decide. certain things happen in life and some people may not be able to support a baby. if a girl gets raped and becomes pregnant does she really want to carry that man's child? i wouldn't. plus some women have serious conditions so if they do carry a child to term they could die in labor. this is not good and they should have an abortion to save their life. it's simply not our choice to decide what people want to do with their bodies and if they feel it is not killing someone then it is not on our plates it is on theirs.
if she cant care for it there are plenty or people out there who want a child of thier own and cannot have one you can always give the child up for adoption
adoption is a piece of shit institution. all the kids who would have been aborted get put up for adoption. what now? thousands of more kids getting shuffled around in foster care, oh boy! and by the way, god isn't real.
adoption is not a piece of shit. i sure as hell would rather have my kid (if i had to give them up) go to someone who has had background checks and various other things before they can adopt. Foster homes aren't even with adoption. those are totaly different things and are bad but not related.
So, are you suggesting that if woman became pregnant accidentally, she should go through with that pregnancy just to hand it over to someone else? Isn't that a bit dangerous for both of them?
babies that are adopted are given to families who want to raise them, not to just put up with them for a few months so they wouldnt be "shuffled around in foster care" they would be in permanent homes so your argument is invaild
Not true. There are more unwanted children than families willing to adopt (123,000 more as of 2008). If abortion were illegal, that number would balloon. stats_research/afcars/trends.htm
exactly why we can't make abortions illegal, if a parent is unwilling to take care of the child they are about to have then they should not have had the child in the first place. since they've already had the child. why should they bring it into the world if it is only going to suffer?
A baby is a life. no one has the right to decide who lives and who dies. the parents should have been more careful if they didnt want a child
Maybe those "young mothers" should have kept their legs shut if they didn't want a baby.
While abortion may not be considered as murder or manslaughter, one thing is for sure. By going ahead with an abortion, you are denying someone, or atleast something life. Life is the most sacred, fundamental right of a human being. While an unborn may not be considered a human being, the fetus would've been a human being. Therefore, you reuse to give life to something that would've been a person. Had the fetus not been terminated, it could've had so much potential. It would grow up to be a child. It would get to listen to music, smell the first day of spring and catch the first glimpse of snow. Everything we take for granted in life and life itself, is taken from the fetus. Many argue that an unborn child does not have consciousness and therefore, it is morally acceptable to undergo an abortion. In the same sense, is it alright to inject lethal toxin into a child that has been sedated for his whole life? Pro-choice people are therefore saying that we can deny life to something that has never experienced consciousness. This argument is irrational and morally incorrect. What's more worrying is that the mother of a fetus makes this decision. The very provider of life and sustenance refuses to let her unborn child live. It is not her choice to make. It is no one's choice to make. No one should have the authority to deny an unborn child life. Imagine the world without you, because your mother had an abortion. You would never live all of your experiences. You would never have emotions. You would've never existed. Such is the travesty of abortion. Over a million lives, of which collectively would add up to over 70 million years, would never be lived. Rape, sadly does happen. But legalizing abortion does not solve the problem. If we want to reduce the amount of unwanted pregnancies as a result of rape, then we need to tackle the issue of rape itself. Harsher penalities, stricter monitoring policies, promoting rape whistles, reducing poverty and a nationwide sex offender registry are all possible solutions for this. Reducing the amount of unwanted pregnancies from rape down to zero is next to impossible, but we can get this number a lot lower. Unwanted adult and teenage pregnancies can be solved by removing the social stigma associated with contraceptives. Pharmacies and the government should advocate the use of condoms or birth control pills as a way to enjoy sex without any unwanted consequences. Abortion means denying the opportunity of life to what would've been a someone. We cannot continue with this madness.
Yea, christians aren't perfect. But is anybody else? If you were responsible you would have done the right thing in the first place, but obviously if you are in the abortion state, you weren't responsible. If you aren't prepared for what might happen due to your own actions, then don't do it. If you don't risk mistakes then you wouldn't be put into the situation.
"" This is where we have a fundamental disagreement. I see the zygote as human life. Not a cell that is part of a mammal. The zygote, if allowed to continue growing naturally, will become a human being. Therefore, to terminate this human life is murder." This is rather dangerous thinking. Whether a the fetus is self-aware or not does not prove or disprove it's humanity. I take it you are gun-ho on euthanasia, possibly even as radical as Peter Singer on these issues." What you fail to realize is that I am not concerned with the legality of this concept of life. this is a profound moral issue. You keep harping the point that life begins at the stage of self-awareness. This is very comical because technically we don't know when that is yet, and we may never know. So to base your argument for the beginning of life on an assumption makes for a very weak point." The zygote that results from intercourse naturally will form into a fetus. Dander will not naturally form into a fetus, unless one goes through means of the things that you've just described; man-made, unnatural means. That's the difference." Sure, up until the point where there is another human life inside that body. There are now two humans rather than one. What about the right of the human inside the woman? You seem to ignore that human's rights." And the woman who has an abortion essentially agrees to assist a doctor in murdering her child by sucking it's brains out. This, of course, is for her own selfish, arrogant, and unethical agenda." When you find a human being that came from a single sperm alone, let me know. Otherwise, what you just typed is ridiculous. No one would possibly even argue that under any circumstances (except you of course).
Abortion should definitely banned except when the mothers life may be at risk. In any other situation, there are plenty of other options such as adoption.
in my opinion it should be because if you don't want to get pregnant why are you having sexual activity
Because sexual activity is awesome and a sign of good health. It is a primal action that is at the foundation of humans' hierarchy of needs (according to Maslow: wp-content/uploads/2009/08/ 800px-maslows_hierarchy_of_needssvg.png) ) So stopping sex is not the solution to the abortion debate. People do need to be careful and do need to be held accountable for their actions, but accidents happen and shouldn't people be able to have a choice in how to deal with such a life-altering event?
What if the woman in question was a victim of rape or incest? Should they have to go through that?
what about rape?? then what? should that poor girl go through her life looking at the child of a rapist?
thats what the other debater said. unless it was an accident or her life was in dangerr
ok and like i saidd, every mothere should have her own desicon on whether or not they want to go through a pregancy. For instance what if it wasnt a accident to have the child and the mother found out that her soon to be baby was special ed. so she desided to get an abortion. I know she's killin a life and i do think thats wrong, but in the same way she might want to protect that unborn from going through pain and trials in the future... Let me remind you that the title of this argument " Abortion should be Banned". Thats a straight forward yes or no question and since there are " what if's" (what if it is rape, what if it's an aciddent , ect.) in this situation the conclusion is that Abortions should'nt be banned.
Why should a mother have the right to dispose of her 'mistake'? Dont want a baby?, dont have sex!!!
I dont think you really read my comment. your missing my point. The topic is " Abortion Should be banned" and sense therre ar diffrent situations such as " accidents" and "rape" abortion shouldnt be banned.
OK but what about all the other cases, which are probably 90% of abortions? Why should someone be allowed to get an abortion just because they do not want to live with the consequences of their actions?
No, she should give it up for adoption and be proud she gave a loving home a child they would not have had otherwise.
Of course it should be banned. Abortion became legal in America in the 1800s and was banned -became illegal - when Americans got their consciences back through a spiritual revival across the nation. At the bare minimum abortion is the taking of one person's life. But when you consider that most people have children and their children have children, it opens a whole nother door regarding the massiveness of just one act of abortion. It equals genocide - on a massive, massive scale. My position is that abortion is unconscionable and should forever be banned and illegal.
- What's funny is that the number of abortions performed were higher when abortion was illegal than when it was legal, and since Roe vs Wade, abortions have continually decreased, especially since the 80s. And, keeping it illegal doesn't stop abortions from happening. It never has. So instead of a legal procedure, being conducted in a safe environment, we're going to end up with a bunch of illegal abortions, in unsafe and unregulated environments. At the bare minimum, it's the destruction of an accumulation of cells. Depending on the week or trimester, a zygote is not alive--can't even respond to stimuli, and therefore cannot be murdered or killed. No, it doesn't. A zygote isn't a "class of people", it isn't even a person yet. There are more murders So? Unconscionable doesn't mean it should be made illegal.
sigh I want to say yes for the most part. I think if people are mature enough to have sex (knowing the consequences of it), they should be mature enough to handle the fallout from it. It should not be used as a form of birth control. If you don't want a child, don't have sex. Simple as that. BUT, then the issue of rape comes into play. Along with the health of the mother at risk. These are two major issues that throw a wrench into my thoughts on abortion. But those would be the only reasons I feel abortion would be "acceptable".
Although abortion is such a sadening thing that hurts me i dont feel that it should be banned. Every mother should have the right to do what they want to do and what they think is best.
What about the child who has no say? When do we start holding people accountable for their actions?
it is also the mother's choice. the child doesnt have no say. as i said they shouldnt be having any sexual activity. i am 11 and i know this....
Its not a child , its a fetus. It has no feelings at all! abortions are made to early for the fetus to feel anything.
isnt that a good thing that they dont feel anything? would you want the fetus to feel it?
True however, we were all a fetus at one time, therefore, it is the beginning of life. A life that many families are dieing to take care of because they cannot have children of their own.
thats when the seriousness comes in. thats when abortion is required. BUT THERES ADOPTION~~
Why not? She can give the child to someone who wants it. Many families are looking to adopt.
I'm against abortions for the most part; I don't believe abortion should be used as a form of birth control as with upwards of 80% of the cases. There are ways to prevent pregnancy which are very effective and to me if a person ignores the use of birth control they should assume responsibility for their actions. On the other hand, there are many instances where birth control has failed, cannot be taken due to allergies, or where rape is a contributing factor to where I would support a woman’s decision if she where to not go through with the pregnancy. As for not being able to sustain a baby financially, emotionally, or intellectually, adoption is an option, saying that you want to abort because you didn't feel like taking or wearing birth control is a poor excuse and shouldn't be encouraged or supported.
Yes, because of awful application or use of the birth control items. If every time you had sex you knew there was a large chance you would become pregnant because birth control is not an option due to allergies, I think you should at least think of consequences before you have sex.
Birth control is not 100 percent effective; one of my coworkers was on birth control and conceived. Now she is a proud mother. Conceiving while on birth control isn't always due to incorrect application or use of the birth control, sometimes a person just falls into that .01 percent where the birth control failed to do what it was meant to. In that sense, considering a person taking it who didn't intend on having a baby and the birth control failed, I would support her if she decided to have an abortion. And who's to say those who are allergic to certain types of birth control aren't already considering the possibility of conceiving? Would thinking "of the consequences before... sex" justify a person’s decision if they conceived and wanted an abortion? If not then why even bring that up?
Abortion is immoral because it eliminates life. When it comes to rape, women can have choice to abort or not abort. I support either decision. However, it is immoral to abort always. I also believe it is selfish. If you are just careless, don't abort. It is not the anybody's fault but the female's fault. Why not the man's fault too? Because the woman allowed the man to fertilize her egg. Therefore, when a woman's get pregnant, it is the woman's fault only. Except when the situation comes to rape but this is not rape. But this topic is pointless. Selfish or not, a murderer will kill, a rapists will rape, a "abortionist" will abortion. What are you going to do? Keep an eye on the woman? You can and i believe you are doing a good deed. But i am not going to spend the rest of my life watching over a woman and stopping her from getting an abortion EVERY time. It is sad what i have said. That i won't help. But i have a life and this is not what i want to do with my life. To put this in short, if a woman wants to get an abortion, SHE WILL GET AN ABORTION. I believe adoption is a good option. And i believe it should be an only option. My opinion is similiar to ColdFire. This is my opinion. I am Pro And Con. Im ProCon. And im not yelling. :) Edit. Im an idiot. It is both the man's fault and the woman's fault for the woman getting pregnant. What was i thinking?
You know that sperm doesn't ask permission before it fertilizes an egg, right? Why not say, "The man allowed his sperm to fertilize her egg?" and blame the man? Why not blame them both equally for engaging in consensual sex? Or why not blame anybody, because that doesn't help anything? Accidental pregnancies can happen to anybody, no matter how careful they are. To think a woman must carry out a pregnancy just because she dared to have sex is vindictive. Pregnancy should not be used as a form of punishment.
In dispute, i don't care about accidental pregnancies. Sex have risks and whenever a couple engages in sex, they should be ready for the risks. I edited myself in my previous comment. Of course it is both the man's and woman's fault for the woman being pregnant. Excuse me for my ignorance. :)
I thought about it some more. I think even tho both male and female are responsible for the pregnancy, the female is more responsible. Why? She allowed the sperm to fertilize her egg. If you only 'blame' the man when he rapes the woman, shouldn't you conversely only blame the woman if she rapes the man? In consensual sex, both partners are equally involved in the decision to give the sperm and the egg the opportunity to meet. "she allowed the sperm to fertilize her egg" like it came knocking on the door of her egg and she decided to let it in. What do you feel is gained from assigning blame to anybody? I don't believe in accidental pregnancies. You might say, what if a condom breaks? That is why on the box it says 99 percent safe. ac·ci·den·tal 1. happening by chance or accident; not planned; unexpected: an accidental meeting. 2. nonessential; incidental; subsidiary: accidental benefits. 3. a nonessential or subsidiary circumstance, characteristic, or feature. I would think a review of the definition would be enough to show that yes, accidental pregnancies exist, whether or not you believe in them. When you engage in an activity, you are not automatically consenting to allow the potential negative consequences of that activity to run their course without interference. For example, every time you get in a car, you realize there is a possibility you will get in a car accident. This does not mean you are consenting to being injured without trying to reverse or mitigate your injuries. You are engaging in activity, recognizing the risks and doing your best to prevent them while still intending to undo any damage that may occur. Removing any sentimentality from the issue of abortion, it is no different. Pregnancy is an occasional consequence of sex and abortion is a way of dealing with that consequence.
[In my point of view, abortion shouldn't be banned. Abortion is a not bad thing for women, especially for teenagers. Everybody thinks that abortion is wrong, but most of those people even haven't been pregnant. It is easier to talk about it and to say that women shouldn't have an abortion, but when it happens it is very hard to make a choice. When people talk about abortion and say that it is wrong, they judge women who had an abortion. We cannot judge people. Abortion is not very good, of course. But it is not wrong. It is a choice. It is a choice of those women who cannot take responsibility for children because of some reasons. For example, just imagine, you are a 16 years old girl who just found out that she is pregnant. You have no husband, your boyfriend said that it is your problem. Your family has no money to take care for your child and you even haven't finished a school yet. What would you do? Do you want to break your life and life of your child just because people told you that abortion is a sin and it is wrong? I don't think so. You would think, even for a minute you would think about abortion. What would I do in that situation? Of course, I would think a lot. But if my situation was very very bad, I would have an abortion, I think. Of course, I would never forget about that. And when I grew up and became an adult with a work, with a husband and with money I would adopt a child. I can explain why. Abortion is a murder. I agree with that. But everybody has a right to be wrong. Everybody makes mistakes. And we shouldn't afraid to make them. We should fix our mistakes. It is called a responsibility, if you do something wrong, fix it. We should use this rule everywhere, as well with abortion. As I said earlier, abortion is a murder. And how to fix a murder? If you killed a child, give a life for another child. It is a solution for that. How to fix other problems? For example, if you stole $1000, give somebody $1000. If you broke a tree, plant a new tree. If you messed up a book in a library, apologize and buy them a new book. And I said, if you killed someone, give a life for someone. So, I can say that all of us make mistakes, we are not perfect. Nobody does. But we have to think without emotions and to fix our mistakes. Of course, if woman has capabilities to take care for the child, it it better not to have an abortion but to give a life for him. But if woman decided not to have a child, it is not wrong. It is not good, but not wrong.]
No abortion is wrong. It's as simple as that it is an option but an evil one. However that being said I do think that having laws against it really doesn't make sense people ought to have the choice that does not however on any terms make it right.
I believe that abortion is something we should embrace as an option but not as the only solution. I saw an awful interview with a woman who "survived abortion" during the seventh month of her mothers pregnancy. She of course is now a pro lifer and spews misinformation about Obama being a baby killer. Nowadays abortions are not typically done at that point of a pregnancy. If a baby cannot survive outside the womb, or outside of an artificial womb known as an incubator, there is nothing morally or ethically wrong about aborting that said baby. A child changes the lives of many people involved. If that child cannot be brought into a life of happiness and a healthy, stable environment- they really don't need to be brought into the world at all. We're there medically. If, according to an above poster, it is the woman's fault, then it of course is also the woman's choice. There's no point in fighting for something that isn't a living breathing thing- embryos do NOT count
I'm against abortion! An abortion can result in medical complications later in life. In the future, woman who did abortion may never be a mother, even if she really want it. Another reason is that this is reduce human rights. The unborn child is alive from the moment of conception and has the right to life.
About rights...A woman also has the right to decide what happens to her body. Just imagine that a little girl was violenced by maniac and what must she do? Give a birth for this unwanted baby? I don't think so. It is wrong to bring unwanted children into the world, because in the future this child will live and doesn't know what mother's love is.
Baby is a gift from God. Kill a baby is a crime. When a woman has an abortion, she will always think about the baby she might have had. She will always think about the future that could have happened with her baby which will always remind her that she killed it. Because she has had an abortion, she will never have a good life, and her conscience will remind her of what she had done.
Abortion is not murder - as it destroys a collection of cells that can't survive outside of the mother's womb before the 24th week. If a woman feels she isn't ready for a baby or doesn't have the means to take care of a baby or just doesn't wish to have a baby. Like any other difficult situation, abortion creates stress. Yet the American Psychological Association found that stress was greatest prior to an abortion, and that there was no evidence of post-abortion syndrome.
Doesn't the fetus have the same right to its own body? Stop with the emotional appeals. If every human being( irregardless of if they are human "persons") has the right to life and to what happens to their body, then a fetus, by being a human being, also has those rights. For preemptive reasons: If a fetus is not a human being, then what stops us from denying babies, old people, or others with limited functionality as being human beings? Is it not wrong for a person to decide if another's life is worth while? I would of reckoned that is for each individual to decide.
If someone is using your body as a life support machine, don't you think you should have the right to decide if they continue to do so? Even if that person is your own offspring, even if that person is a completely self-aware adult, your body should not be used for anything against your ongoing permission. If physical autonomy is less important than another human's life, then the door is opened for things like government mandated organ donation.
Exactly, which is why it is her own fault she is pregnant in the first place.
Just because the child is unwanted does not mean it is unloved furthermore there are far more suitable alternatives like adoption, simply put abortion is 99% of the time wrong, because whenever one hundred percent people freak out like WHAT IF THIS HAPPENED!!?
You are sickening. The odds of a mother not being able to have children later are so low. You need to get this: WOMEN CAN DO WHATEVER THE HELL THEY'D LIKE TO DO WITH THEIR OWN BODIES. I don't care what your sociopathic disgusting god says.
Then maybe they should make better choices with regards to birth control. It's their fault they're pregnant. And don't give me that rape argument, only 1% of abortions happen because of rape.
Buddy, you're definitely right about the rape situation. Only 1% percent. But what you don't understand is that you have no business getting into their business. They can do whatever they'd like. They don't need to justify their actions to you, or anyone else. And a fetus isn't a human. Not even close. Only a biblical retard would believe that.
Whether you agree or not, abortion will always play an active role in our society. In the US, more than 4000 cases of abortion are reported on daily basis. While for one, abortion can be a highly miserable experience, to the other, having a forced child can be a highly miserable experience. It’s impossible to go by a rule book, because it's life.
People should have the choice to keep their baby or not. If you think its wrong, don't do it. But people should have the right to make the choices that affect their life.
I realize that adoption affects the parents lives as well, but would it not be better than killing it? Won't killing the fetus have a potential emotional side-effect on the parent? They would go through life knowing that they killed their own child.
I believe that if a parent can take care if a child then they shouldn't be able to get an abortion, but sometimes a child being born causes great strain on the parents and could possibly lead to death. Therefore, I believe that it should be the person's choice.
ummmm no you are so wrong in my opinon! i think that if you are adult enough to have sex you better be adult enough to take on the responsibilites that come along with having sex.
What happens if the mother is raped? Could you ask her to live with the offspring of a obviously demented rapist. Being a mother is hard enough to add that to it as well. What if the child in the womb is damaged or deficient beyond help. A young mother that is duped and lied to by some swaggering Lothario that walks out and leaves her with the child. There are many situations under which you are completely wrong. People need to take responsibility for the amount of children being born into broken homes and poverty. Poverty breeds just look at the street children in calcutta or the child soldiers in Sierra Leone a lot of this stems from religious belief as religion, lack of education and poverty all go hand in hand.
It would be really unfair if the mother was raped and she has to bear the emotional pain of having the child. If the mother was careless and say she was in high school, she would have to drop out of high school to take care of her child. In this cases I think abortion should be legal. Its true that the mother should have been more careful but should she ruin her whole life with one mistake? Through all this what about the child's feelings? If the mother was raped would she be able to take care of the child properly without having a emotional grudge against the child. I heard that the pain from rape never truly leaves you, you move on but you never truly get over it. The child would also have to grow up without a father. If the mother gave birth to the child in high school, she would have to drop out. The child will not be able to receive the full attention the child deserves from his mother if shes trying to take care of the child and study/work at the same time. It would be even worse if the father did not take responsibility like in some cases of teenage pregnancy. In other cases where women of any age are pregnant but are not prepared to take care of the child they give the child for adoption. The child would grow up in an orphanage without ever knowing his real parents. If the child is adopted, how would the child feel? The child might live with hate for his biological parents for as long as he lives and if he is not, does the child deserve to grow up in an orphanage without parents? So this is why I support abortion.
The debate of abortion goes further than 'killing' a fetus. What you are saying is 100% correct. We are humans, we do stupid things and accidents do happen. There is no point in bringing life into this world if there are no structures in place to support this life.
The problem people have with abortion is the image they have of a baby dieing in the mother's womb. Unless you can remember what it was like in and coming out of your mother during birth then you can not argue that baby's know that they are dying. Babies in the womb are not thinking and do not have brain function other than to keep their organs functioning. People all need to realize that if a baby is not going to make it, the mother is not going to make it, or both aren't going to make it through birth. By disallowing the option of abortion to that mother, not only do you deny the mother who will die the right to Live but also you deny that baby a mother.
I believe early abortions are ethically sound because all you have at that point is a clump of cells -- not a human being. Destroying a clump of cells is not murder. I believe late abortions are wrong because at that point you have an almost fully developed human capable of thought and feeling. Killing a developed fetus is murder. So we are forced to draw a line somewhere and say, "After this point, abortion is illegal." I believe Roe v. Wade did a reasonable job of drawing this line -- after six to seven months abortion is illegal.
Regardless of how developed it is, it shall develop later. A two-month fetus has no memories, no sentience. But, in a few months, it shall become a 'human' in the legal sense. Why does the mother have a choice on whether the baby lives or not?
Potential life doesn't matter. Why should it? If you could somehow turn every speck of dust into a human being, then every speck of dust could be considered potential life. Would it then be morally wrong to destroy a speck of dust? No, of course not, because potential life doesn't carry moral weight, only actual life. The mother has a choice because: 1) Pregnancy is a pain in the ass 2) Childbirth is dangerous and 3) If she goes through with the pregnancy she will have a human being she will be obligated to care for.
Pregnancy is a pain in the ass I would be willing to go through tremendous pangs to save a life, as would many others. Why else do soldiers get injured/killed trying to save people from minefields? Childbirth is dangerous Just how often to mothers die during childbirth now-a-days? Two answers to that: Put the baby up for adoption. Leave the baby at a firestation. Potential life? A fetus is alive, regardless of how developed it is. That alone should give it more rights than some damn speck of dust!
A one month old embryo is only alive in the strict biological sense, the same way a plant is alive. Why is ok to destroy a plant but not an embryo? Neither one of them can think. Neither one can feel pain. It's only wrong to kill a developed human being.
Regardless of whether it is fully developed, it surely shall become so soon. Just think, thirty years ago (or however old you are), you mother may have decided to abort you. You are saying that it would be her choice, but would you have opted for it? It is not her life, it is yours. Wouldn't you rather be alive? How about the millions of others who have been aborted over the years. Why don't they have a say in the matter?
I'm asking you why it's wrong to destroy potential life. You're saying it's wrong to destroy potential life because it will become life. In other words, it's wrong to destroy potential life because it's potential life. This is circular reasoning. Embryos don't have a say in the matter because they are not yet humans. If I had been aborted as an embryo I would not have given one rat's ass, because I would have been incapable of doing so. No harm, no foul. The world keeps spinning. What's the big deal?
Just because it isn't born yet, what makes it any less of a human?
Abortion rights are being abused. It should not be looked at like an easy form of contaception. "People ought to abstain from sex or practise safe sex." Yeah ive heard that argument before , However; Abortion is a serious matter and unfortunately there are cases in which an abortion is neccesary; articles/goodwin.html
I agree that there are times when an abortion is necessary, but when one want's to kill over the fear of parenthood - that is when things are getting out of hand.
since abortion became legal in the US in 1973 50 million abortions have been performed. that would knock out 15 states with no1 in them. that ridiculous. there are millions of people in the world who would love to have children but cant. and we have millions of people having sex and not being able to handle the consequences of pregnancy. if u have sex u better be ready to have babies too.
Because, you know, there isn't a surplus of orphans or anything./ Should women who don't want kids have them anyway out of guilt for people who can't?" That's stupid. Just..... stupid. So a woman should go out of her way to NOT solve a problem just because she got herself into it? If you tripped and broke your arm should you NOT get a cast on it just because you were foolish enough to trip? maybe you shouldn't have been walking if you weren't ready to handle the possibility of breaking your arm. Maybe you should of had the good sense to wear a bubble-wrap suit. No? Why does that backwards logic only apply to abortion then?
It is not a problem, it is a life. A broken arm is an injury, easily mended. When a person's life ends, there can be to going back. It is in no way backward logic. You are equating a human life to a broken bone. If it weren't for that life there would be no bone to break!
Sure there is, you can make another kid later when your ready. But what about the loss of life that has already taken place?
Well hey, it has the potential to do all those things. You can't know it wont. Why is a sperm suddenly too precious to let die just because it meets an egg? Especially when any other sperm can do the same damn thing. Sperm and fetus are the same, the only difference is a fetus is a few steps closer to being birthed. You're older than me, probably a few steps closer to making your own children than I am. Is your life worth more than mine? Surely you must think so. A fetus is closer to being born than a sperm, just as you are closer to creating a fetus than I am. You're one step farther on the chain, so, is it alright for people like me to die en masse as long as you get to live? And furthermore, I am farther along the chain of life than a fetus. I am much more capable of creating life than a fetus. I have much more potential at this time. Sure, the fetus has the potential to one day be like me, but right now it is not. That means it's worth less right? Is it o.k. to abort millions of un-born children but not o.k. to kill me? No? But at the same time, it is o.k. to let millions of sperm die, but wrong to kill a fetus. Why? Because one is farther down the road of life than the other? Or is the life of a fetus worth more than any other conceivable form of life?
I agree with Kmac. If you think you are old enough to have sex then you better be old enough and ready to deal with the possible consequences of having sex. There is always that possibility of becoming pregnant, so if you have sex and get pregnant deal with it!! Abortion is just wrong. Why kill someone that has done nothing wrong? The baby should not have to pay for your mistakes. If you can't handle having a child then let someone adopt it, don't kill it!
Many proponents of abortion say that it is up to the mother to decide what happens to her body. However, they seem to be forgetting one key matter: does the baby not have a choice as to it's body? Some say that cancer is alive and that by killing it we are ending a life. However, cancer will never gain sentience; cancer will never learn; cancer will never go to school. Cancer is like a parasite, feeding off of the body and expanding until the body is dead. I am completely for the use of the term 'fetus.' The excuse for the abortion is that the baby is not yet a baby, rather only a fetus. That is where they are wrong. A fetus is just as much a human as I am, it simply has not progressed to the point in life I which I have reached. Soon it shall be a baby, then it shall progress to toddlerhood, then to childhood, then to adolescence. It is not a baby, but it shall become one - just as an adolescent is not an adult, but it too shall become one.
kmac and princessjess are right abortion is murder. if you feel that you cant take care of the child, adoption is an option. there are families in this world that can not have children. why not give the baby to them so it can be happy and have a good life. there is nothing wrong with adoption
Some would argue that the adopted parents will not love them as much. Whether or not this is true, I believe it preferrable to murder.
OK first off Abortion IS murder weather you believe it or not it IS. Example: Scott Peterson in trial was convicted of TWO murders not ONE but TWO why two though? He just killed his wife? His wife was pregnant. The baby inside of his wife was killed in the process of the mother being killed. If the supreme court agrees with abortions yet charge Peterson with two murders what are they thinking?! Once the a egg is fertilized and starts to grow into a human body it has a human "spirit" or "soul" inside of it (for those who are religious). So if you were to "dispose" of this body that IS alive and has a human "soul" within it isn't it the same as murder? Your taking away the life of some creature that has not yet experienced life yet. The baby moves, blinks, kicks, and squirms inside the mother, this is the sign that it is alive and is capable of understanding of what is doing (not of everything its doing) and human beings do just the same. So lets put a full grown man/women inside a glass incubator filled with water and have them semi-conscious. And then lets put a drug in there to kill this person. Then, put a giant vacuum tube into the container and suck all there body parts out. Is this murder? Some people will say "Oh well, that isn't the same. That person is fully developed and eduacated" There is no difference between killing the grown body and that of a one inside a mother. Weather it's there choice or not to get the abortion it IS still murder. People should understand the consequences of having sex and abortion should not be a option. It leads to people saying "Oh I can just get it aborted so I don't have to worry about it." &lt;- LAZINESS. We already have enough lazy citizens in the US I don't think we need anymore.
"" Is this a quantifiable statement. Are we capable of saying that 2 minutes after conception, that bundle of 8 or so cells is not just a human being, but has an intangible "soul". And those toe nails i just clipped that are made up of millions of cells, or if a hair gets plucked along with the root that still has a lot more than 8 cells, those have souls too? At what point is the now separate entity no longer "you"? If one wears protections, is that not killing potential for having something with a "soul"? Or is the woman's period also murder because it also is killing the potential for a new human being?" I really don't understand how it's possible to say that a human being, having been alive, having consciousness, can be compared (even in a drugged stupor) to a collection of relatively inanimate bunches of cells. I agree that at a certain point, when the fetus has begun to kick and to show brain activity, that it is now murder to have an abortion. But up until that point, I believe the mother has a right to terminate the pregnancy. Additionally, you are forming your opinion based on an assumption that all accidental pregnancies happen through laziness. But what if the child has some terrible genetic disease that will render their life to be agonizing. I remember someone referenced a disease on CD where the baby lives for about an hour after birth in terrible pain. Wouldn't it then be mercy then to prevent this from happening before the bunch of cells has become conscious? Or if the woman was a victim of rape or incest, and she got pregnant. I doubt that she would love this child if she carried it to term, and so the child would probably be emotionally malnourished the rest of its life. Would you want to sentence someone to that kind of life? Another way of looking at is, okay the courts and legislature have agreed to your point of view. Abortions are now illegal. However, that does not mean that people wanting abortions aren't going to happen, and it also doesn't mean that people will stop getting abortions. Women who don't want to or can't carry a child to term will be forced to go to back alley doctors to perform the abortion (or perhaps worse, try to do it themselves) and those unqualified doctors' abortions could lead to their own death in addition to the fetus'. Also, those back alley doctors will no longer have restrictions placed upon them. They will be able to terminate a pregnancy well after consciousness has begun and the fetus is now a baby. Even when abortion is legal, this kind of stuff happens too much, and imagine how much worse it would be if abortion by qualified doctors was illegal.
Ok, really? You could have just kept this to yourself. I say these types of things in my head when I read some debates but, I don't post it. Alright, let me put it this way. Once a human "organism" is made it is alive. Whither people like it or not it is fact that it is alive. It moves, it eats, it grows, it thinks. Are these not all the contributing factors of how our bodies are alive?
"" Absolutely, and I think that most of us on the pro-choice side would agree that a woman's right to chose ends by the time a fetus reaches the stage where it eats or thinks. But the anti-abortion side is not content with that. They want to outlaw abortion from the very moment of conception, at which time the "organism" as you call it does not eat, does not move and does not think.
"" Thats not laziness thats disgusting. Abortion rights are being abused. It should not be looked at like an easy form of contaception.
I don't think that it should be completely pro life, but rather what the circumstances are. For example, if the abortion is because of rape, incest, mother's life is in danger, then I completely understand the reason. However, if abortion is done because protection, either a condom or birth control pills, were not used, then abortion should not be allowed. Be responsible for your own actions.
Please not that this debate has nothing to do with the legality of abortion. I believe that it is better off being legal, but moderated as well. If the mother wants an abortion bad enough she shall get the fetus out any way possible, but if it were illegal she would be going into dark alleys to get it done.
I strongly think that we should stop abortion, if you don't want the baby put it up for adoption. I'm sure there are hundred of families who would love that baby as it's own. Couples out there who cant produce offspring that desire a baby. Then your taking away something you can get and they can't.
Yes, but are there enough homes for 50,000,000 babies? Is there enough food to feed 50,000,000 more mouths? Will there be enough food to feed 100,000,000s more babies in generations to come?
Abortion is immoral. The law prohibits it. The growing fetus has a presumptive personality by which the state has a responsibility.
Abortion is immoral to anyone with a heart and a sense of what is right and wrong. But our law in America allows a mother to kill her unborn child, as long as she hires it done. If she does it herself she may face being charged with taking a life. Our laws are whishy washy about this. They do not give the unborn personhood and protection, they stand on the principle that its the womans body and then they stipulate when she can have the abortion. Science is clear to when human life starts....and it does not start after nine months of pregnancy.
Yeah sure, I'm pro-choice... pro-choice in the sense that the choice is made when the soon-to-be mother chose to act irresponsibly and have unprotected sex. So many liberals out there try to paint this idealistic picture that you can make stupid decisions without any real consequences, but that's simply not true. When you have unprotected sex, a baby is conceived. At that moment, whether the baby has a pumping heart or not, it becomes a mother's natural and personal responsibility to do what is best for the baby. That could mean one of many options, such as raising the baby yourself, putting it up for adoption, or any number of alternatives. But I will tell you, as basic human decency should tell you, that anyone arguing that the termination of that baby is what's best for the baby is wrong in the most perverse way conceivable. You chose to act irresponsibly. Now you must face the consequences, and just because you don't want to does NOT give you the right to terminate the existence of a potential human being. Now, of course there are cases of rape and/or incest conceptions. In these cases, I do not feel that the mother should be forced to carry a child she does not deserve to have. She did nothing wrong, and should not be forced to carry the offspring of her rapist. But at the same time, I still believe that life begins at conceptions, and at that point it become a moral judgment for the mother to make. Do you believe in giving life to another human being, filling it with opportunity to make a name for himself or herself, or do you believe that you'd like to deliver children following consensual and natural intercourse between a man and a woman? At that point, the government should have nothing to do at all with the mother's say; she is no longer the irresponsible one, but rather the victim of a gruesome and despicable crime.
You chose to act irresponsibly. I got pregnant whilst using the contraceptive pill, it's not as uncommon as you think. Don't assume every person who is pregnant isn't responsible. Just to clarify I didn't abort her, I have a daughter. However I'm just using this as a point that not all accidental pregnancies are because people are stupid enough to have sex without contraception. Now, rape and incest aren't the only circumstance that warrant abortion. Have you considered medical problems, deformities and disabilities in an unborn baby? What about a heroin addict, a alcoholic? What about someone with severe mental health problems (bi-polar, schizophrenia, BPD)? How about a homeless person? Do you think it is okay in these cases? I don't think any situation should dictate whether a Mother decides to proceed with a pregnancy. It's how the mother (or doctor) perceives the circumstance of her pregnancy. If she feels the unborn child would have a negative life or her life would be impacted seriously (not superficially) then she has the right to terminate her pregnancy.
If you are a woman and have a brain you know that any birth control method can fail, unless she has had a hysterectomy. So the woman takes the chance, it is her decision, HER RESPONSIBILTY. It's not always about stupidity...but that does not chance the responsiblity part or the fact that says....a human life starts at conception. Why do you feel that rape and incest warrent abortion? Is the innocent child in the wombs life less than one in a womb who got there by a mother who was not raped? Do you think that if you walked into a hospital nursery and you were told that one babys mother had been raped...that you would be able to pick it out? Why does two acts of violence make sense? So the woman goes through the rape and then knowing she killed the child inside her. Do you know how mothers would cope with this extra trauma? And are ing that because a child has a deformity that it deserves to die? Wow...how compassionate and materialist you are. ARe you perfect in appearence? Lets abort babies because they have problems.......Hitler had the same idea did you know that? He believed in killing the weak, the dredges of society. Again you are blaming the unborn for the sins of the parent. I have personally seen drug babies...and while they have a hard time at first...they can be saved and they can lead normal lives. You are making excuses for the killing. How about the woman who does not want to get stretch marks...the woman who wants to finish school, the woman who does know who the father is, the woman who does not want another child of that sex? You know it is sad that you feel this way...that you would be so judgemental that to solve a problem you have to kill a living human being. That you would speak for another human who cant speak for themselves, and choose death. You are choosing death...for all the "what-if's" What right do you have to determine how someone MIGHT LIVE? What if you were poor....and the government said that everyone who made less than a certain amount couldn't have a child, that if you got pregnant you would have to abort because if you had one it would be a burdon on society. Would you be ok with that? What did you mean by your comment....""? What right do you have to tell a woman why she cant abort at any time?
You really are a sexist pig. The male who has sex with her and impregnates takes half the responsibility for pregnancy. It's not solely a woman. Because if a child is going to make her life more awful than what she's already experienced she has the choice to not go through that. I'm not saying you should abort in these circumstances but I understand entirely why people do. You are possibly the biggest word mincer ever. I personally wouldn't abort a child on these grounds and I'm not saying people should. But yet again I understand and sympathize with someone who does. .Hitler had the same idea did you know that? Stop calling and comparing me to Hitler. It's so rude. You are making excuses for the killing. I'm not making excuses. I'm saying I understand why woman would abort in these situations. Stop acting like I advocate death and I'm murdering people. I think that's probably a very selfish reason however I don't know the woman's background maybe she has serious depression and her self esteem is low. Hence I said "life would be impacted seriously (not superficially)" Oh and in response to your question about I meant, I mean personally if someone were to abort because it was the wrong sex or something along those lines I'd probably think it was a bit selfish. But I wouldn't out right deny the woman the right to do so. And don't call me a hypocrite, because I still believe the woman has the right to abort under those circumstances. This is coming from the person who believes a woman has no right to abort at all? A woman can abort for whatever reason she likes it has nothing to with me I've never led you to believe that I think only some woman can abort. And just to clarify I've already posted the scientific studies and facts on when a baby feels pain and it's brain is active, and why that is my defining limit on abortion gestation with some exception. If you couldn't be bothered to read it that's your problem.
What I just said is fact like it or not. You want to say that abortion should be legal because its her body...her decision but then you want to blame the man for the risk SHE TOOK. You look silly. Our laws say that the baby is not his enough to be a part of the decision...he has no choice in the matter. Why men don't see this and storm in outrage I don't know. Who is the one that gets pregnant? Can the man get pregnant? Who takes the risk? Either you are so young that you don't know better....or I just don't know, your ignorant about what responsiblity is. You are cold. But then you respresent death to innocent human beings because you are a pro-abort. You champion killing. And that is what abortion is...whether its in the first month...or ninth, its killing. The abortionists goal isnt to shoot a documentary, or catch a fish, or play a round of golf.......it is to KILL THAT WHICH IS IN THE WOMANS WOMB. It got there sissy because she opened her legs and allowed sperm to swim inside her. She is the one taking the risk...not the man. You're a typical pro-abort all over the place, not consistent at all. Sigh If a child is gonna make her life awful...kill it. LMAO So compassionate of you. catticus....is there something wrong with abortion or not? You personally believe...but you still condone....yes, but no....but maybe... You gave devormity and imperfection as a valid reason for aborting. You personally wouldnt abort on these grounds.........well my dear what grounds would you kill? I bring up Hitler because Margaret Sanger...influenced him and she was the founder of Planned Parenthood. Your views on this mirror theirs...because they acted them out. Do some research and you will see. Google...Sanger and Hitler...then see if you agree with them. If you don't I would like to know what you disagree with them on. You call me a pig and then tell me I am mean for comparing your views to Hitler? Come on........LOL Do you also support the women who are afraid and kill their born children...Do you also defend people who murder, rape, steal?........hell......you make excuses for everything. You are making excuses by simply not standing up for the unborn. You are saying death should always be an option. How do you go to bat for the innocent in the womb? You don't. You think its wrong to abort because the woman does not want stretch marks, it was the wrong sex .....but its ok, if its deformed. Do you ever read what you post here and really really think about what and how it sounds. YOU YOU YOU....think What do YOU think any aborted child in the womb would say if they could talk (hell infant babies cant talk either) and address the one who killed them, the one who presumed they would have a horrible life? you would not deny a woman the right to kill, therefore you are pro-abortion, because your response does not defend the life of the ones being killed. You are like the person who drives them to get the abortion cause they have no car...and you think you did nothing to contribute to the killing. LOL You pro-aborts kill me....no pun intended. What does pain have to do with anything? The point I was trying to make was...that you are probably pro-abortion UNTIL.......the time you think the fetus can feel pain. And geeze oh petes...we certainly dont want them to feel their skull being crushed do we? I mean that would be inhumane right? You are a joke. the woman has the right to decide whether or not to kill her baby whatever the reason...(the man is not an issue unless money is involved) but that it shouldnt be her responsiblity only........(what the man should pay for the killing?) you think when the baby can feel pain abortion should not be allowed.... not allowed...after some date you randomly have thought up in your head to when the baby MIGHT be viable. I know the studies...I know people who have done the studies. The fact is....that which is in the womb is human, is alive and is a growing person. Science is on the side of life and defines it in terms that are not pro-choice. Life was not concieved to kill in this way, it is unfortunate that you and others do not put any worth in the womb.
I can assure the only person who looks silly here is you. A man is HALF the responsibility of a pregnancy. It's not my fault that a man has no say in abortion maybe if you actually read what I type you would of seen me say that it's probably unfair that a man by law is denied a say. However in a lot of circumstances the woman consults with the man and they come to a mutual agreement on whether to continue the pregnancy or not. A woman gets pregnant a man gets her pregnant they BOTH take the risk. They are both equally responsible for a pregnancy. I know far better than you I've had a pregnancy, I have a daughter, I have one of the greatest responsibilities an individual faces because I am a parent. Don't patronize me. It's nice that you have to resort to name calling and insulting what a wonderful Christian you are! Why are you implying that every pregnant woman is some sort of whore. The man is JUST AS RESPONSIBLE FOR PREGNANCY he allowed himself to get a woman pregnant. Your opinion is sexist is so many levels.. You don't have to be completely decided on an argument since day one of this debate I stated it's neither right nor wrong it's based on circumstance and how the woman feels. I don't condemn anyone who has abortion. I wouldn't have an abortion personally. Just because I think other people have the right doesn't mean I'd do it myself. The only reason I'd kill another person is to defend myself or my child. Are you fucking kidding me? Here is one of Margaret's views advocate abortions on Afro-Americans in order to eliminate what she called "socially undesirable people" so I'm a racist now? And there is a massive difference here for a start. I don't believe anyone should be forced to have an abortion it's their choice. And another She called for the halt to the medical care being given to slum mothers, and decried the expense to the taxpayers of monies being spent on the deaf, blind and dependent. She condemned foreign missionaries for reducing the infant mortality rates in developing countries, and declared charity to be more evil than for the assistance it provided to the poor and needy. Sanger's thinking moved to fascism in an elitist attitude that presumes to judge who is worthy to live and to die. I don't agree with ANYTHING this woman promoted or believed. She didn't believe woman had the right to choose abortion she wanted to force them without a choice. She is racist scum and I have no common ground with any of these views. This is the most disgusting thing anyone has ever accused me of. How dare you?. I never denied that I called you a name. Hypocrite. All you've done since this debate began is name call, I will retaliate. No I don't, they're not even the same thing. They're not the same circumstance. I don't make excuses I share my beliefs and opinions and they vary on all of these subjects. How is not condemning something making excuses. Not everyone has to agree with you, it's not the final word or the truth it's an opinion. Hold up! I didn't say it was wrong I said it was a little selfish. I never said she couldn't. You are a vile, horrible person to accuse someone of acts like this. How dare I contribute to abortion. If a woman asked me if she should have an abortion I'd say 'It's up to you, it's your choice'. I wouldn't judge her, I wouldn't influence her opinion. If someone is considering an abortion than they aren't anti-abortion anyway and pro-abortionists existing won't mean diddly squat to their decision. Yes it would be inhumane to inflict pain onto a fetus in my opinion, hence I think it's okay before then. Pain has everything to do with it, if death wasn't painful people wouldn't be so scared of it. I don't have to be entirely pro abortion. Just like I wouldn't advocate theft but in a certain circumstance I would like if my daughter was starving I'd steal food for her without a second thought. Again thanks for the insult, what a wonderful Christian you are. You can act self-righteous and holier than thou but you are a terrible person verbally insulting people, demeaning them and being downright rude. Not to mention you lie. Very Godly. Is that your opinion that a man is not involved unless it's money? You're wrong, having been pregnant and had a child my partners financial contribution to her life are the least meaningful thing, his love and nurturing for us throughout pregnancy and into life is. If you're lying again and claiming this is my opinion then again you're obviously very wrong. What? A date I randomly made up? No the youngest baby to live is 22 weeks that is the viable age as our medicine currently stands. And the second trimester is when a baby feels pain that is science, I linked you the information but it's clear you obviously don't read half of what people try to say to you. Which is where I get my opinion on when I think abortion is okay. If I had no worth for the womb why would I have a child?
No my dear you do not obviously know the law. Our government says the child belongs to her, that she has the right to terminate the pregnancy WITHOUT ANY CONFIRMATION FROM HIM. He does not even have to know, even if he is the father. If he was recognized as a player...the law would not be what it is today. Nothing forces her to put him on the birth certificate either. That is the law. The fact is, the baby is hers at conception….she took the risk. The sperm leaves his body...and enters her. His part is done. The sperm was a gift, he certainly can’t ask for it back can he? LOL She holds the cards and has him by the you know what...that is if he wants the baby, because whether he wants it or not.......it’s NOT AN ISSUE. Of course I am a Christian and don't believe it should be this way, but that is the law today. I believe personally that the man should be considered....that she should not be allowed to make a decision like that of abortion. Like I said today she can kill and he need not even know it. I talk to men all the time whose wives or girlfriends got an abortion behind their backs. it’s unfair........why? You are trying to make yourself feel better look better. You are pro-choice and believe the option should be there remember. Consulting and being an equal member who makes decisions is another thing. Am I calling names? Didn’t you call me a pig? Better reread that section. Am I insulting you because you are pro-abortion? Well gee I am sorry, the truth hurts. yourself that you believe for whatever reason…that abortion should be legal and an option for any woman should she need it. Now if the way I described it sounds crass…sorry, but I was not going into a lengthy description of how babies are made. Most abortions happen on unwed women....women mainly who profess to be Christian in fact. That does not change the fact how they got pregnant. Why don’t you describe it for us in more politically correct terms? It still won’t change the truth of how it happened. As I said AGAIN……….the man is an onlooker so says the law….that is if he is not married to the girl who is allowing him in. Is that better way to put it? You are absolutely unbelievable. You want to blame……and blame you do, for what is a woman’s issue, so says the law. What do you not get? Don’t you have the guts to call it like it is? If the man is accountable wouldn’t he have a decision in the pregnancy? NO THE GOVERNMENT SAYS NO. HE IS NOT AN ISSUE and HE IS NOT RESPONSIBLE. As for condemning anyone for an abortion…this discussion is not about that. I work with women who have had abortions….because I know what it’s like, I had one. I was one of those women who spread her legs. It was my call, my responsibility and the pain and agony I suffered was on me as it should be. So don’t tell me or begin to know about how it feels or what someone goes through. The work I do is in this field, I see the pain, especially afterwards. And guess what………..the pain is just not experienced by the woman, but by the boyfriends, the husbands the children. The woman calls the shots as I did when I had mine some thirty years ago. I would give anything to be able to take that day back…and I know hundreds and hundreds of women who feel the same way. You are pro-choice whether you want to believe it or not…BECAUSE YOU SIMPLY CONDONE OTHERS the right to kill. Were the people that stood by and did nothing about those who were marched into Hitler’s ovens… pro-life? How about those people that owned slaves? Would you have owned a slave or condoned someone else owning one? And do you have to use the F bomb in order to debate? Is it an effective way to get your point across? Of course you will retaliate…you condone abortion which is violence. You ranted on…… I was making an analogy that you simply did not like. Well does the person who takes the money for the killing contribute? How about the nurse that hands the abortionist the tool that crushes the skull? If someone drives someone to a robbery….and they are caught….does the police just say….ok you had nothing to do with it goodbye? I mean come on. If you refused to take her to the abortion, she might not get it. If the doctor didn’t show up, the nurse refuse to do it…the baby might have a chance. You’re so ridiculous it’s not even funny. Bolonga…many people are afraid of death because they do not know what is beyond it….not just because of pain. Insult? Retaliation, isn’t that what it’s all about, so yourself didn’t you? Then you judge me when you think I retaliate….why are you judging me from different standards than you live by………? LOL Oh yes because I am a Christian, right. Am I supposed to just sing kum ba yah around a campfire and shutup, not stand up for the things THAT ARE UNCHRISTIAN? No case for abortion can be made scripturally. Christ would want me to stand up the his little children, he would want me to share my testimony and how my sin, devastated my life until I came to Him. So you don’t like how I put things……..Christ said, they hated me first and will hate you as well. I am not demeaning anyone but stating the truth. You might be the greatest person in the world, but you are pro-abortion and do nothing to stand up against this injustice. you are not for and against....you are for......because you think it should be legal. I said, if a woman and man are married……he cannot stop her from killing their child by abortion. He has no rights even though it is his child. BUT HE WOULD BE HELD legally responsible for child support if HE DID NOT WANT THE CHILD AND WANTED HER TO GET AN ABORTION. She calls the shots. Now if they were not married, she can’t hold him financially accountable for anything. The baby is hers, unless she puts his name on the birth certificate…and in that case he might for forced to pay. Well you are wrong again…. James_Elgin_Gill 128 days early… or 21 weeks 5 days early Then there was Amillia Taylor who is also often cited as the most-premature baby. She was born on 24 October 2006 in Miami, Florida, at 21 weeks and 6 days gestation. At birth she was 9 inches (23 cm) long and weighed 10 ounces (283 grams). She suffered digestive and respiratory problems, together with a brain hemorrhage. She was discharged from the Baptist Children's Hospital on 20 February 2007. There are babies like this all over the world being born. My niece was born 23 weeks 4 days. She spent five months in the hospital but is perfect today at 18 years old. She weighed just over 1 pound. I know the information out there…you need to get educated and read a bit more, instead of just google and posting. Pain is not an issue….personhood is and you do not give the fetus any personhood at all. “" You value your own child and don't care about another in the womb....????? Yea that is odd for someone who would stand by while another child was slaughtered. Just makes it all better if you know it is painless for that fetus at 22 weeks, right?
When did I say that wasn't the law. Do you read anything I type? Tell me how many people it takes to conceive a child. Can a woman conceive on her own? Can a man produce a child on his own? No. Both sexes are required to conceive a baby, they are both responsible for the act of conception. What? Answer this question please. Does a man make a conscious decision to have sex and deposit his sperm in the woman? Does he know that the woman has a possibility to get pregnant? Does he know that if she were to get pregnant the woman would have the right to abort? Yes he knows all of these things. And yet he still chooses to impregnate a woman. Therefore he is half responsible. He is not stupid he knows the risk just as much as the woman and takes the responsibility just as much as the woman.. If the man is to be considered then he has to be considered on all grounds. Which means if his opinion was taken into consideration by law then he could force a woman to abort a fetus that she wanted to have. Seeing as you're anti-abortion wouldn't that bother you? Well if they talk about it they obviously know about it. it’s unfair........why? I said what's unfair? Am I calling names? Here's a list! Directly copied and pasted from what you have said to me. Is this what the word of Jesus taught you do? Name call? Materialist Judge mental You look silly your ignorant You are cold. You champion killing sissy Hitler, Margaret Sanger. Your views on this mirror theirs. You are a joke You’re so ridiculous it’s not even funny you respresent death to innocent human beings You deserved to be called a pig. I hate sexism. I'd call you a pig if your were racist or homophobic, being sexist is discriminating and holds the same grounds to me. Oh and perhaps you re-read that section because here is what I said I never denied that I called you a name. Hypocrite. All you've done since this debate began is name call, I will retaliate. I'm not the one in denial. I called you a pig once. You've demeaned and name called multiple times. I know and your point is? What on earth are you on about? I've had sex I know what sex entails, I know how a child is conceived. this It got there sissy because she opened her legs and allowed sperm to swim inside her. She is the one taking the risk...not the man This is SEXIST, you think a man has no responsibility for getting a woman pregnant. Of course he does. Could a woman get pregnant without a man? No. Therefore the man HAS to assume HALF the responsibility for a child being conceived. There are two things that create a life, an egg and a sperm. Half and half. They both decide to have sex, they both know the risks, they both procreate. They are both responsible. An unmarried man has the same say as a married man by law. For someone who claims that I know nothing on the law of abortion you sure know bugger all yourself. girl who is allowing him in The man also allows himself in. Stop implying the girl is always the instigator of sex. If the man didn't want to have sex and ejaculate in her then it would be rape. If he didn't want to get her pregnant he could have said no or used a condom. Just as the girl could say no or use a condom. They both take equal blame. How, explain to me how scientifically a man is not responsible for pregnancy? That is how it is I'm afraid. It takes a man and a woman to procreate. They both did it. He doesn't have a decision in pregnancy by law because....oh God do I have to repeat myself AGAIN...because if he chose for her to abort when she didn't want to he would be forcing her. It's not the man who has to carry the baby for 9 months. And if you READ what I say... most fathers do have a say because the mother and father will come to a mutual agreement. Seriously? All you've done is called everyone names and demeaned and condemned them for believing a woman has a right to abortion. because I know what it’s like, I had one I'm sorry about the fact you had one but it doesn't mean I can't look past the fact you are a complete hypocrite. How dare you tell me I contribute to abortion and patronize me like that when I've never done anything to contribute to abortion and you've In a sense I'm beginning to feel like you have had some strange notions thrust upon you. And I actually feel very sorry for you. Someone has clearly put it into your head that you are bad person or a whore or something. The person who had sex with you and created your child is half responsible. It takes two people to make a child. You cannot create a life on your own. Again stop lying about things I've said. I never said I did, in fact this seems to be a trait that a lot of Americans have that I hate. Telling someone 'I know how you feel'. I see the pain, especially afterwards I have friends and family who have had abortions I would never claim to know how they felt, they talk about it and of course most of them are distraught. It's abortion. I never said it was happy fairy la la land. However they could have felt worse if they had a child. What about mothers who are forced into keeping a child and are miserable, unable to love the child? Do their emotions mean nothing? I'm not denying it isn't an upsetting process, stop assuming you know everything about my opinion when I haven't even spoken a word about this. Who in their right mind would tell a child they aborted their sibling? How selfish. I'm sure there are plenty of woman who feel they did the right thing too. Not pro-choice thanks. I have a limit. That's like saying 'you're a speeder and broke the law because you drive fast even thought it's within the speed limit!' It makes no sense. What has the holocaust got to do with abortion. Since they felt pain and were living, viable humans this has no relation to my opinion. Again what does having a slave have to do with abortion. Of course I wouldn't and I wouldn't condone it but you're just talking about meaningless jargon now. I sure has hell do when someone accuses me of being a racist murderer. I don't think calling someone a pig is violent, how did you come to that conclusion? I didn't say pain is the only reason people are scared of death. Stop lying. I'm not scared of what's beyond it, I don't believe in religious afterlife in a heaven and hell sense. And if it was true, which I don't believe it is, everyone I love and know has already been condemned to hell in the eyes of God, I'd rather be there supporting my friends and family than sitting in heaven with you. You accused me of having the same views as a Nazi, you accused me of being a racist murderer. And now you think beecause people perform abortions and assist them they are Nazi's? By the way I am none of these examples and I've never contributed to an abortion. Do you think you are a Nazi and a racist murderer? Since you had an abortion? Abortions are free here. And I also think you've got the abortion operation all wrong. They aren't performed like that anymore. You name called, you didn't retaliate you instigated. Since revenge is against God's will wouldn't you be sinning again if it had of been retaliation. I'm not judging you by different standards or religion. I'm just telling you what the Bible says, isn't that what happens at church every time you go? Are they judging you? No I just don't want to be quoted scripture since I don't believe in it as the divine truth. It's worthless quoting the Bible to me. I will only accept proven fact as a reliable source. Refer back to my list of insults and things you have compared me to. Good. If they were married like you stated he wouldn't be paying child support anyway. Well you are wrong again…. 128 days early… or 21 weeks 5 days early 02/worlds_youngest.htm Actually she is. Are you really going to be that pedantic that you will argue I was one day out on her age. Why don't you produce a real argument? For the final time read what I say. Or I'm just going to ignore you and watch you continuing to manipulate the truth and lie. I said I don't believe abortion should be allowed past the second trimester as that is when the fetus feels pains. Unless it's a medical reason for the mother or baby. Why because you post things from Wikipedia? Wow I wish I had that knowledge. Don't tell me I need to 'get educated' I think it's clear to see who has more accurate spelling and grammar. The only things I've posted are links and small quotes. Everything else is my words. You ask for evidence you get it.? I don't really feel the 'worldwide love'. I love my family and friends. That is it. I am not religious or spiritual I do not feel compelled to love anyone other than the people I feel genuine love for. I do not love you, I do not love strangers whether they be child, adult, fetus. At best I like some random people. That does not mean I don't value other people though, I value good people, respectful people, kind people, intelligent people e.t.c What do you want me to do set fire to the abortion clinics? Did you want me to pioneer a revolution? Do you want to preach to people? Sorry I won't and I can't. If I saw an actual baby or child I'd intervene with their death. But what the hell is someone meant to do about a fetus. Tie the mother up and feed her through a drip until she gives birth? Fuck sakes, read my words PLEASE. When does the second trimester begin? 12 weeks that's when a baby feels pain, derp. I already said that about 6 times?
It takes two, the woman can’t conceive on her own and no man can produce a child on his own. But that has nothing to do with responsibility. Our government even though it recognizes the father if they are married…does not take him into consideration, should she want to abort. He simply is not an issue. The government recognizes the risks of the woman and awards here the right to decide. If they are both are responsible for the risks they take…then why are the fathers rights stripped? Yes he does. Yes he does. Yes he does. BUT, he also knows he can walk away if he doesn’t want to be involved. Example….. Two kids having sex on the beach during spring break. They want to have sex obviously for pleasure. They might not even know their names or where they are from. Now who takes the big risk should they get pregnant? The guy or the gal. Who can fade into the sunset, never to be seen or heard from again? THE MAN She takes the big risk. What risk did the kid take? NONE. This Cassie Anthony trial…..she says she has no idea who the father of Caylee was. She was known for sleeping around and they did DNA samples on many of her acquaintances. Nothing turned up. They even did DNA on her father and brother. Who got pregnant, who had the baby? She did…because whether reckless sex happened or not…the risk she took didn’t pan out….she got pregnant….and where is the dad??????? Well in my opinion he should be considered on all grounds. In this case I believe she should have the baby and that because she did not want it, it would go to him. And you want to compare your use of the noun Pig…to the descriptions I have used? Do you know the difference between a noun and an adjective? You gotta come up with something better than this. LOL A pig is a filthy animal that lives in a sty………LMAO How old are you really, are you even an adult? What I stated was the truth in the nicest terms possible. And why are you bringing religion into this. All these humanists bringing religion into debates…when I have not. Is it because of my name? Again ignorance…go research what a churchmouse is. Do you think that Christians because of the love commandment should just take it…roll over and play dead? Why do you judge me by perfect standards and not yourself. You have a filthy mouth and it demeans your posts…and makes you look like you have no class. You use the F bomb like it’s a conjunction. Your views on abortion and the reasons for it mirror Hitler and Sangers and I could add a few more for that matter…..but will leave it with these two. Why don’t you do some heavy research on this…not just cut and pasting something you quickly found on google? Your position is heartless, cold, and you like I said are ignorant of the facts. Your pro-abort position makes for champion killing, not life. I said, And this is not championing abortion? LMAO And you want people to believe your pro-life? LMAO I said this, Why? is biology sexist? The truth is the truth it seeks no sides. We have hashed this over and over and you will never get it I’m afraid. The man does not have to assume squat…unless he is married and the courts order him to pay. Did the kid on the beach have to do anything? How many one night stands you think happen when the male just takes off…knowing or not knowing if he impregnanted the woman? Only because she says YES. He goes on her invite. If they are running around the bases…have not scored a grand slam… and she says no……..it’s no, you can’t come in. If he does against her wishes it’s rape. Instigating has nothing to do with this. But whose body is changed by the sex act? Not his..Hers. She knows that what he might leave behind will affect her for at least nine months. He knows that it won’t affect him in the least…..UNLESS HE IS MARRIED. It does take a man and a woman to procreate…which is why I also am against same sex unions, it’s not natural…but that’s another debate. They both have sex….blah blah……..and as I said unless he is married he can take off and never be seen again. SO WHO TAKES THE BIG RISK? Sure some married couples are on the same page….but we will never know how many married women go behind their spouses backs to kill, because they know their husband would not approve. There is no way of knowing that statistic. Why on earth would you of all people be sorry? Mind boggling to say the least. I am not a hypocrite, I simply made a mistake lived in hell and want to share my story. My kind of story is the one PP does not want out there, because they want abortion pictures in the best way. Tell me……Have you ever in your entire life made a mistake? Did you ever think you knew the truth about something and then found that you didn’t believe that way all along? Are human beings allowed to make and learn by their errors? What?...we can’t change our minds about issues, feelings? Must be nice to be perfect. Well my position on abortion changed….and I am allowed to change my mind…..are you? When you make a huge mistake….if you have children don’t you want to protect them, teach them what might hurt them? What you’re saying here….is that I do not have the right to change my mind, I don’t have a right to warn people about what could happen especially mentally with abortion? You are the one who is judgemental and arrogant….. but then you’re perfect remember? Oh my goodness don’t. I was not a child when I had it….I should have known better…and I took the risk because I knew what would happen. But like most others in the heat of passion I guess I didn’t care and did it anyway. No one thrusted anything on me, and guess what, I do not blame anyone but myself. I am a wonderful person MOST of the time, not perfect like you but I am ok. I have raised two wonderful, happy and successful children, am a grandmother to two little girls, have been married over thirty years to the SAME MAN….and have a blessed life. Christ forgave me when I became His. And I promised Him that abortion would be my witness…to share what HE did for me in my hour of need. I am the luckiest person in the world. The baby I aborted was my husbands. A pregnancy at that time would have been hard. We were on the same page…until later…when I started suffering, he could not understand my feelings. He was supportive but of course our faiths in God are different, because when I became Christs, he didn’t. Worldviews change….and mine did drastically. We have adjusted…and he now tolerates my feelings, actions. I do not force my beliefs on him. I pray someday we will be on the same page. Distraught about what? Tell me….how can you on one hand think abortion is horrible, not a fairy lala trip….then go against what your morals tell you is wrong? I don’t get it. Abortion if you have ever seen one is horrible. Have you ever seen one? Anyone who does not see one and think it’s horrendous…is cold, compassionless and EMPTY. Here watch this……..and if you don’t, think about the reasons why you won’t. Search your heart…about why you would support something so barbaric. And if you have children….put them in the place of the tiny one who is getting slaughtered. I am not Catholic but they always have good stuff on their sites about abortion. What is upsetting about it? And who says the kids are young? I wouldn’t tell a child about abortion for all the obvious reasons. I would at least wait until the child was the age when a lot of kids are having sex. I told my kids when they were teenagers. It’s not selfish…its real life and it happens. Kids see a lot of gruesome stuff on television. What makes abortion different you tell me? It’s the most performed surgery in the world. I said, You are pro-abortion period, end of story. You want to deceive yourself into thinking you’re not but you are. You condone what that video I wanted you to watch…shows. That’s what you think should be legal. You do not stand up for all life. Well there were people back then who stood by and did nothing….and looked the other way. In a way it was humanity at its worst that let all those gassed down. Everyone participated……good should have overcome evil, but didn’t. People act out of fear….and I am sure there were people who did not like what Hitler was doing BUT DIDN’T DO ANYTHING TO STOP HIM…I am talking about the people in his own country….the people who could have physically taken himout….the guards, etc. Abortion is like that….people sit by and do nothing….they think anything they do….won’t change the laws, won’t help the victim. But if every pastor on every pulpit preached the evils of abortion….if every parent with compassion in his heart would stand up for what is right and good…….abortion would once again be considered murder. If we stood up as a nation about the evils of abortion….wow….how many lives would be changed, hearts mended. But we are a secular country that has turned its face from God…and it shows by our morals and our morals influence our laws. I work with people who are atheists….so it is possible for people with no faith at all to stand up and make a difference. Its knowing what is right and wrong, what is good and evil………..standing up for it, no matter what. Again talking about standing up for what is right, doing the right thing……..even if you are swimming up stream. I know the odds are against abortion being overturned are slim to none……but I keep working and praying I am wrong. Society is sinking into a moral less abyss. You condone murder….I never called you a racist. I never use violent adjectives on you….you used a noun to describe me. And swearing is classless…. Well you hold the cards to your future eternity. No one else is responsible but you. And if you’re wrong…you will have all eternity to think about it. How do you know EVERYONE has been condemned? And how do you know that you will be recognizable in hell to your family and friends? If you went to hell with them…..being with family etc…would be just a tad bit good…you would have support, be near the ones you love. And if you have support, then it is not hell. LOL What happens if you get there and you can’t find anyone? Well you would have all eternity thrashing about to find them I suppose. I know many people in my family who will not go…that is their choice. I bothers me, and I cry about it sometimes when I am praying. But I love Christ more than any other person in the world….and I have faith in Him….more than I have faith in anyone that has ever been in my life. I believe that I will not know if any family does not make it. Heaven is perfect….and it would be hell if you knew someone was not there that you loved. It’s funny all the nonreligious, materialists, humanists, atheists, agnostics always bring up religion, must be they think about it a lot. LOL I do not feel I called you names. I described and compared your worldview to people you obviously you have a problem with. I am certainly not trying to get revenge, come on. I am simply showing you why your worldview is not compassionate or all that good. I am bold, and I do state the facts in ways people feel offended. But I think down inside they are offended because what I say exposes them, gets them thinking about what they think is ok. And you think abortion is ok. And….you are judging me…I point out what that are untruths but I am not judging your heart….I can’t, scripture does not allow me to do that…not unless you claim to be a Christian. That is why I bring no scriptures up with you because you don’t know better. God will judge you. I can however judge actions (not hearts) of Christians as they can judge mine and many have done that…I thank them for it because many times more than I would like to admit, I needed judgement. Why do you quote a book you don’t believe in? LOL You don’t believe in it, yet you use it to make a point. LOL You are a pro-abort and you champion abortion period….live with it accept the label take it as your own. LOL Boy you are really diggin deep now…. I post rarely from Wikipedia….and on this forum have posted from very reliable sources. I am not however handing my posts in to be graded….so I could care less about absolute perfect spelling and punctuation. I work….I live a full life and when I get on here….I slam it out the fastest way I can. If I had to hand in an article or paper ….it would be correct. You have provided however little evidence, more lies. Just like the lie about the earliest born preemie….I showed you your error. I work in this field and I know…. This is your worldview…and explains what I said all along…why you are pro-abortion. The lack of love for your fellow man shows your true heart. I feel sorry for you actually. Who is setting abortion clinics on fire? If you compare the acts of violence against how many abortion clinics there are in the world……its nothing. Pro-lifers are basically kind and compassionate people who respect the law…just try to change it. Am I preaching? What is the difference between you putting opinion and facts out and what I am doing? Do you ever look in a mirror? You simply act like a juvenile. You have no class... You do not even know what you are saying. LOL two things in your post…………you are against abortion at the end of the second trimester which would be 24 weeks….and here 12 weeks it feels pain. LOL Can’t let this one go……your hilarious. I mean that in the nicest comedic way possible. LOL This is what earlier… So is it 12 weeks when the fetus can feel pain….or 24 weeks when obviously it can’t. LOL You do not even know your own position. That is why you look silly and have to swear. Do you even know when the fetus can feel pain? LOL Naw…you don’t.
Even if they are married it's the woman's decision still so this has no validity. No, no, no. If he is considered on ALL grounds then if he wants and abortion and she doesn't then his opinion counts and his vote for abortion could go ahead. You also called me a sissy? Sissy is actually considered homophobic by a lot of people. It's not an adjective. Brush up on your English language. It makes no difference if I said you're like a smelly tramp it's no nicer than saying you are a smelly tramp. I'm a fully fledged adult. It is not the truth it's your opinion. And I'm arrogant yet your feelings have to be the truth? Yay another list for me to make. Things you have said religiously to back your opinion: I can't be bothered to go through your previous debates but you have mentioned religion a lot more than this. No, a swear word is a word. It means nothing. Oh look another insult to me. Why thank you very much. And I'm not 'classy' it's not something I can aspire to with all my tattoos! I think a few re reads are in order here. Read their opinion and read mine. It's not even comparible. My education is nursing. I am going into midwifrey I can assure I need not much education on human biology and the facts of abortion. My opinion is what you think is heartless and cold. To many others it is acceptable and logic. Don't speak for the world. I'm not pro-abortion is should be considered as a last resort. And if the last resort is an abortion then I accept that. I don't champion killing, I don't tell anyone to abort and I don't abort myself. I just understand why people do. Why? Biology isn't sexist again I study it. The context in which you describe things is sexist. The truth is what you perceive it to be. The truth is never what you think. Yes he does. If I had a child unmarried knew the father but we weren't a couple he would still have to pay child support. My fiance and I weren't married. He took responsibility. He admits he took the risk even though I was on contraception. Stop speaking for everyone not everyone shares your opinion. Not true. I state the facts and back them up with scientific evidence. You champion killing so you don’t want to see the evidence. No you don't. You've posted 2 links from wikipedia that prove nothing and a link to a catholic website which I'm not even remotely going to listen to since it is there to create fear into becoming religious. I post genuine scientific evidence and have done throughout my debates. I use my evidence you use yours. Why does it matter? Not true, go educate yourself, not going to do it for you. Bugger? Boy have not heard that one since Kindergarten. Because my opinion differs to yours I'm uneducated? No, I have educated myself and come to a conclusion. You have come to a conclusion I'm not going to tell you your opinion is wrong it's an opinion. That's the difference between you and I, I can accept that my opinion isn't right for everyone. You're a forcer, you think that everyone has to share your opinion or they're a bad person. And educate yourself on world language bugger is a common word among adults in England. So because I believe woman have the right to abortion I no longer have feelings. I feel empathy and sympathy, it's hardly mind boggling that a human being as emotion towards other peoples negative experiences. Stop word twisting. It's funny you'd repost my statement that abortion is a distressing thing to go through and then claim I want abortion to be seen positively. Consistence in the key in debating. Something you clearly don't have. Yes and yes. I never denied this fact so I guess I'll just answer the first two questions. You can change your mind all you like it's no concern to me and I never claimed it to be. I'm allowed to change my mind, I probably won't on this topic though. No I'm not. I'm saying don't judge people on actions you have taken yourself. Again I'm aware of the consequences of abortion. Are you aware of the consequences of having a child you never wanted? Explain to me exactly when I have judged someone and acted arrogantly? Thanks for calling me perfect all the time. I don't believe it myself but you seem to for some odd reason. I protect my child and I will teach her the obvious stranger dangers e.c.t. But I'm not going to tell her to never have a friendship in case they fall out and she gets upset. I won't tell her to never have a relationship in case they break up. A lot of things hurt people you can't lock them up in a box and hope they never socialize. If my daughter was ever pregnant I'd help her. If she asks for the pros and cons I will tell her. If she asks me what to do I will say 'darling, whatever you feel is best for you'. Why? Because her happiness is the most important thing to me. stood by and did nothing in the holocaust because they were scared. And people did do something hence there was a war because people rose to fight the injustice. They didn't let Jews get gassed. Everyone participated? That's a wild claim to make. Most people in the world did not participate and a lot objected and acted upon that. Did I say you were? And I'm arrogant. Stop calling me perfect, I'm blushing. Great. I have a wonderful child to. This means nothing to the debate subject. And being with same man isn't an accomplishment. It's a choice. You aborted but have the right to tell other woman they can't? Or that they're like Hitler? That they are murderers? Come off your high horse.. Distraught about what? Having an abortion, derp. It is a horrible experience. My morals don't tell me it's wrong in all circumstances. Abortion is horrible, I've seen many. (The nursing and midwife studies might have resulted to this being true). It's not cold, uncompassionate and empty. You yourself said it's emotionless. How can it be empty then? I'm a bad person even though I assist in saving lives during pregnancy and child birth? Do you know how many unborn and born babies lives nurses and midwifes save? And because we choose abortion to be okay you think we are heartless murderers? Of course abortion is upsetting for a child. The word 'kid' kind of dictates a young age? I thought that was common knowledge. So they weren't children.... Abortion of a sibling effects someone personally. Watching south park doesn't. Well I listed the names so you if you don't believe fact that is your ignorance. Of course I have problem with racism. No you think I am pro abortion. I know I'm not. I am neutral if anything. I don't deceive myself into anything, you want to believe I am so you can preach. Even if I was it doesn't make my opinion wrong and yours right. I stand up for life especially those already born. I stand up for a woman's life and her choice to abort for a start.. I No you are demeaning an opinion because it differs to yours. Because you don't like my opinion you assume I am an awful person. I had the same opinion as Hitler and Margaret who are racist. So yes you did. No you're not. You are trying to warp my opinion and claim I am a bad person because of it. Your opinion is not right to everyone. Just because you believe something doesn't make it the truth. You just offend people by dismissing anything they say. You haven't exposed me. My opinion is the same and your debates don't make me even think about changing it. I never judged you on the basis of your abortion opinion. I point out what that are untruths They're not untruths, you believe they are. Just because you don't agree doesn't make them wrong. Not once have I quoted the Bible. Perhaps say when? Didn't think you could... Again your opinion is not fact. You think I am pro-abort it doesn't make it true. Great, I study work and have a 8 month old. I still find it takes no more than an extra 5 minutes to type most things correctly. I haven't lied once. You constantly lie, I pointed out every lie. All my scientific evidence I have posted with my debate. I don't want to count them but anyone who is reading can and will. I work in this field idiot. Nurse/midwife mean anything to you? It doesn't explain anything. I said I value people I just don't love them unless they are my family or friends. I can't pretend to have feelings for a stranger who means little to me. I certainly would never love you. Worldwide love is mostly a religious belief. Since I have no belief in religion I feel what I feel is right. Don't feel sorry for me I'm so happy and fulfilled with my life. Huge difference. I haven't told you your opinion on abortion is wrong. You tell me I am heartless a murderer, cold, ignorant. I accept my opinion isn't fact you can't do that. You place no actual evidence just your opinion. Your opinion is NOT fact. LOL Ever heard of reading? It will do your argument good. They feel pain at the beginning of the second trimester (around 12 weeks) and I think abortion should happen before that. Honestly, you liar, I said what about 30 times? 24 week abortions are wrong. Yes it is 12-14 weeks. Like I said all along. What the hell are you talking about? I said all along abortions shouldn't be allowed at 24 weeks. I know my position. I swear because I want to. I like swearing it's as much as the human language as any other word. Yes I know when. The fetus feels pain at the beginning of the 2nd trimester, again I've said that all along.
1) And yet, half the people here were talking about how it's the woman's choice ONLY. The argument people ALWAYS make are that it's "the woman's body." Interesting. 2) I actually can't agree with this. Rape is more iffy of course, but I don't think the child should have revenge taken out on them for being raped. The father who raped the women should suffer: not the child. I somewhat understand that point, but I don't think it makes anything right. I also think incest isn't much of a reason (Unless you're talking about the pedophillia related incest...) unless the women is AGAIN needing it for medical reasons. But consensual incest shouldn't equal death. I don't condone incest, but it's a lesser evil to other things. 3) I can understand it if the baby has a deformity that WILL actually hurt them in the future. 5) the others; not much to argue I guess.
So a husband and wife that don't want children can never have sex.... Contraceptives fail. So two people who don't want children can not get married - lack of sex is a slam dunk claim for divorce or annulment. You are required to fulfill your marital duties or your partner can divorce you in almost every state. In addition a healthy sex life is cited by almost all marriage councilors as vital to maintaining a healthy marriage. So how would a childless (by choice) couple be acting irresponsibly? In addition what is the difference to you? Either they are going to have sex and and abortion (if they get pregnant), or they are going to abstain so as not to take the risk of getting pregnant if abortion is made illegal. Guess what - either way, no child is ever born. That couple has decided not to bring a child into this world under any circumstances. Personally I don't think they should have to go their whole lives without having sex.
They can have sex, but they must be prepared to deal with the result of it. Since when was sex the only thing that kept together a marriage? The purpose of marriage is to start a family, which includes supporting each other in BOTH good times and BAD. If you aren't trying to start a family then GTFO :) A childless couple isn't acting irresponsibly if they are prepared to take responsibility if they have sex.
Again a wonderful post animegirl. People especially women do not want to take responsiblity for their actions...it's always someone elses fault.
I support what ...but I would add this....when a child is concieved...there is nothing potential about it. It is already a living human being. And I would ask you to think about the rape and incest clause in your position. Let me ask you this.........if you believe a human life starts at conception, how is death right for even a child of rape? If you walked into a nursery full of babies and the nurse told you that one out of the twentys mother was raped...would you be able to pick that child out? Life is life and although rape is a violent act...so is abortion. So rape is the first wrong....and then on top of that abortion is another. The woman can live with two crimes. That is the same as incest. If you are pro life that means you value ALL LIFE, not just some. If you are pro-choice and think that abortion should be legal even though you think its gruesome and wrong.....then you are not pro-life. Being pro-life is being against abortion period...unless the woman is dying on the table...and then in most cases both can be saved.
Abortion in general is wrong in the sense of life being erased. It may be less so if it's for a valid reason like health. But I think that abortions made for more reasons than that is the result of selfishness usually...
Abortion: When life becomes subjective, and a killing an option. Since when is it acceptable for people say that because it's not 'quite human' we can just do whatever the heck we want with it? The logic of something needing to PROVE that it has a right to live is just sick. Why is it that we get to define when it's okay to exterminate something? Why is it okay to kill an unborn child, period? It might be understandable in some situations, but it doesn't make the choice RIGHT. I LOVE how a person can go to jail for killing their household pets, but then it's suddenly perfectly okay to kill an unborn child because it hasn't met someone's standards of "It deserves to livee~" I can support a person's decision on the matter when it is completely necessary, but all the people who think abortion is all right and good is just sick :/
It is neither right nor wrong. I agree that the latest time to have an abortion should be reduced. In the UK it currently stands at 24 weeks, which is also an age a baby can survive. I think it's dependent on the situation of the pregnancy. If the child's going to be brought up into a life of poverty, abuse and just be bloody miserable well what kind of an existence is that? I also agree when a child has severe deformities or disabilities or an instance or rape (because of religion raped children as young as 7 have had to give birth which is no life for the baby or the mother). Even discounting these things it's still a woman's choice. At what point do you consider it to be killing a human life can I ask? Is it once an embryo has implanted or earlier (contraception)? My main concern with anti-abortionists is that they don't consider the problem of over-populating. If no one had an abortion could you imagine all the extra people there would be populating the planet? We would be in a massive state of poverty, much more drastic than we see now.
I am aware that your arguments were for someone else. However, I have a couple remarks about your arguments that I would like to share with you… What about the victims of rape? Should young girls risk their own lives for something they did not even consent to? Death penalty gives us the right to decide whether someone dies or lives. At war, soldiers constantly decide whether innocent enemy soldiers and civilians should live or die. So, human beings are given the right to kill others. You did not state any proof. You only quoted doctors who agree with you. I have one last question: Do the rights of an embryo outweigh the rights of woman?
Murder is a legal definition. It is the unlawful killing of another human being. Thus Abortion is not Murder. Shooting a burglar is "taking someone's life without permission" however that is not murder either. The right to bodily sovereignty should be absolute. What right is more basic that control over our own body. You have the right not have an operation, or medical care or drugs. You also have the right not to forcible donate blood, or organs, or risk your life to save another. All pregnancy carries risks to life and health, the fetus uses the mother's blood and organs. She has a right to stop their use. Can she abort in the 9th month? No, but she should have the right to evict. She has control of HER body, not the fetuses.
Take this hypothetical. A woman, her child and a doctor are out hiking in no mans land and they have an accident (a fall lets say). The child is injured. He needs a blood transfusion and the mother and child are the same type (the doctor is not). The doctor explains the risks to the mother - the child needs a lot of blood and he has no way to measure how much is being taken... there is a risk she will loose too much blood and die. She agrees He hooks her up, so she is supporting the childs life. After 10 minutes she is starting to feel lightheaded, and gets scared. She decides she doesn't want to do this anymore - she has 2 other children at home that need her. Does she have the right to unhook herself? The child will surely die. Of course she does, it's legal, and nobody has ever tried to make it illegal. Even after agreeing, and being hooked up, she can change her mind. So if a women gets pregnant, and the fetus is hooked up to her, why does she have to stay hooked up? At some point between her and the fetus the umbilical is part of her body. Does she not have the right to disconnect it if she feels she is not up to going through with it? Why would a women be legally required to keep her fetus alive by allowing it access to her body, but has no legal requirement that she keep her child alive after it is born (even if there is 0 risk to her life)? A women has a right to not have her body used by someone else.
Nothing is one sided. There is good and evil, but mostly gray. There is neutrality in everything . How can there is no neutrality? That's naive. I don't sit the fence, I say the radical opinions are idiotic, and it's foolish to not think they are. To say that you can kill a fetus at any stage in the pregnancy isn't right, but never allowing a women to do something specific to her own body also isn't right. Why do I say that? Well, simple: humans cannot judge humanity with our mere senses. The fact that we can't is the reason racism and fascism and sexism exists in the first place. You can't judge humanity by yourself and neither can I. Nobody can. But we're supposed to be beyond that sort of thing. Open-thought and technology accelerate us as a race. We're better then to take radical sides anymore. With that said, what constitutes a human being? Most would agree that a consciousness, a soul, constitutes a human being. We can't measure a consciousness without machines, but we can still do it. If we can only measure humanity by measuring consciousness, then that means, until a fetus has a developed brain with measurable brainwaves, it is only a mass of soulless meat. It's a mass of meat until it exhibits brain waves for the same reason a severed arm is a mass of meat: just because it's made of human flesh and cells doesn't make it human. It has no consciousness, and therefore it has no soul. You cannot measure it's soul without measuring it's consciousness, so you cannot presume that it has a soul before it has a consciousness, but you can presume that is has a soul during and after it has a consciousness because you can measure it's consciousness. Therefore, abortion is moral up until the fetus develops a consciousness. Afterwards, it is a human being and cannot be aborted. If it is aborted at that point, it is murder. Before then, it's not. To say that one radical side is right over the other is foolish. Both sides are illogical and presumptuous. Neutrality is the only logic and morality.
I said there is good and evil and mostly gray, don't mince my words. Rape is one of the few things that is unconditionally evil. But even rape has neutrality in it. Let's say you rape someone as evil as Hitler, a murderer of innocent people. Is that evil? No. Fighting evil with evil is not evil, it is neutral. There is only one truth, yes, but my point is that you don't know what that one truth is. Human perception is the only thing we can run on because it is the only way we can see things. You can't, I can't. Therefore, you cannot make assumptions of what the truth is by putting in place of it your opinions. My abortion belief is not opinionated in any way, and that's what separates me from you. It's a radical thing to say abortion is wrong under any circumstance because the idea that it is takes away freedom from certain people. Is taking away freedom right when people don't all share you ideas? No. And yes, there is a gray area in pedophilia you ding-dong. Have you no imagination? Here's a scenario: You are an adult, and you make great friends with a teenager; one day, you fall in love with him/her and they feel mutually back despite you being much older then them. Is that love wrong? Just because there is an age gap? Not necessarily. Not all pedophiles are evil perverts just because you think they are. What Hitler did WAS wrong, did I dispute that it wasn't? But in fact, it was gray in some areas. Why? Because he saved Germany. He did more evil then good, but in the end, he still was some gray despite being a lot of evil. The 9/11 bombers were wrong to, but you have to realize, they were brought up in a third world country where they had nothing, where they starved to death whilst people like American's were getting hundreds of divorces every day. Yes, they killed people, but they suffered and died for their actions. Even in those acts, there was balance, despite being mostly evil. It's meant to be contradictory. I don't believe in either radical, I trust in the balance between the two which I explained. Why are you arguing as if I believe in both of them at the same time? I'm not pro-choice, I'm just on this side of the debate. The fact is that a fetus isn't human at a certain stage and completely human after a certain point. Just because we judge doesn't mean we know. I know facts when I speak of my abortion ideas, but I do not know facts when I make opinions of you. You're right, you don't need anyone to tell you right from wrong, but neither do I, because I don't have opinions about this, I know facts about this. That's what I base my morality on. I don't care what the dictionary says. Use your own definition for a human being. What separates humans from most animals is that we have a self-aware consciousness, a soul. Some animals also do, but not all, but that doesn't mean we aren't still defined by our personality, consciousness, and soul. Just because something is alive doesn't mean it's alive like a human. A mushroom is alive. Is is it wrong to step on a mushroom? No, it has no consciousness. A severed chicken leg has living cells (for a time after being severed), is it wrong to cook and eat it? No. It has no consciousness. What about a human finger? Is it by itself human because it has living cells (for a time)? NO. To say it is human for that reason is illogical idiocy. Yes, humanity is measured by consciousness. You think the mentally retarded have no consciousness? They do. They feel and think and have a soul. People in commas are sleeping. For a long time. They think and feel and have a soul. Vegetable people are not human. They brains are dead. They feel nothing, think nothing, and have no soul. Only their organs are alive and their brains have no function except to keep their life processes going. They are vegetables. Are vegetables people? No. The person they were died with their brains. So yes, vegetable people are soulless piece of meat . I know that a soul inhabits a body when something has a consciousness. We have machines to tell this. What you do not have is a machine that can show that a soul inhabits a body before something has a consciousness. Also, yes, I am God. I am a Pantheist. But that has nothing to do with this debate. If humanists mention souls, then apparently I'm not a humanist. Duh. No, I am not a butcher, but anyone can be a butcher if they want. The point is that masses of meat aren't human, dummy. Just because it's made of human cells doesn't make it human. Just because something is unconscious doesn't mean it doesn't have a consciousness. So no, I am not being unscientific at all, nor grotesque and insane. You're insane for mincing my words together and taking everything I say in a manner that it does not mean. Abortion to purify races isn't right if that's the intent. But the act of the abortion at a stage before consciousness isn't wrong, the intent is wrong. Stem cell research is very beneficial for medical research. Though, killing a conscious fetus and selling it's body parts is immoral and disgusting. That intent is wrong in some cases, but only the intent, not if the act of the abortion is before the fetus is conscious. Once again, the intent is wrong, but the act of aborting before the fetus is conscious isn't. I'm all over on what? Abortion is right when the fetus isn't a human. Once it's human, it's wrong. What's complicated about that? I know when a fetus is human, I can prove it. You can't prove that fetus is human before it has a consciousness. Yes, I do, you do not need to provide a link. No, I did not say that, I gave it as an example of one of the extreme points. I've already said 3 or 4 times that I do not agree with either extreme point, I'm just on this side out of coincidence, and now because you're zealously pro-life. No, my comments are morally logical and make plenty of sense. What you thought my comments said by mincing the words together inside your mind is what makes no sense. What is wrong with you?
No, I see abortion as acceptable up until a certain point and evil after another point. You forgot to listen to me again. The gray area is that the overall event of abortion can be good or evil, either black or white, therefore it in itself is gray if you look at it in it's entirety. Cultures that think it is acceptable to invariably harm the existence of an innocent human being are either going to collapse because they're psychopathic, or they're going to collapse because they are overall brainwashed into not believing that the act of rape doesn't invariably harm a human being. Stop acting like there are tons of cultures that think murder and torture and rape are right, because there aren't. Cannibalism isn't common because only psychopaths and stone age cultures commonly practice it. The same goes for rape and murder. You think murder is acceptable in a place like China or Kuwait because they have different cultures then us? It isn't. Because culture does not bypass morality. The human mind does. Evil, in a way, is in the eye of the beholder. But harm is not. If you negatively effect the existence of a human being, you are harming it. Whether you think you are harming them or not does not change the fact that you harm them. The ability to attempt perceive this is programmed into our brains through morality. What you need to understand is that harm is infallible. It doesn't matter if Hitler's Nazis thought they were murdering evil Jewish people, because they were, in truth, harming the existence of the human race by deriving it of millions of people. Just because a group of Christians beat a person with turrets to death because they think he's possessed doesn't mean they didn't harm the existence of that human being, disabled or not. Harm is not subjective. It is a state of existence beyond the ability to perceive. It's radical to say something is totally wrong when many things are not totally wrong depending on the circumstance. Stop calling you names? No. You look foolish for obviously being close-minded and not even being able to understand anything I'm saying. My example is NOT sick, you are just a neophyte with no imagination! You think it's wrong, no matter the circumstance, for a perfectly sane and conscious adult to have sex with a perfectly sane, conscious, AND consenting teenager? I said teenager, not child, and there's a difference. Does your morality really only go so far as the law does? What's the difference between a consenting adult and 17 year old having sex and a consenting adult and an 18 year old having sex? The difference is that the law says one is abhorrently wrong... which is, in fact, bullshit. Having sex with someone extremely young is wrong because the child is not consenting and/or under agreement and/or understanding the circumstance in the first place. A teenager at a certain age has the capacity for all of the same things an adult has, including love, judgment, knowledge, awareness, coordination, everything. And if the teenager is a little young and doesn't have have all these things, they have almost all of these things. Who are you to dictate that love is wrong based on law or order? Consenting, mutual love is beautiful and chaotic and knows no boundaries. Which brings me to a question for you... if a 90 year old and 60 year old fall in love, is that wrong? There's a 30 year difference, as where a 14 year old and 18 year old have only a 4 year difference. It's illegal for that 18 and 14 year old to fall in love and exercise their love, so why shouldn't the love between a 90 and 60 year old be illegal to exercise physically? Do you not see the whole in that logic? A consenting, understanding person is a consenting, understanding person regardless of age. Children are never consenting and understanding people in regards with sex. Some underage teenagers, on the other hand, are , by mathematical probability. Mutual, understanding, consenting love shouldn't be restricted by the law, and if you have any compassion, you'll have an imagination and agree with me. Facts I know about abortion? Facts about abortion are that the fetus does not have brain waves, and therefore a consciousness, until a certain stage in the pregnancy. That's a fact. Duh. I've said that about a dozen times to you. It's funny how you've showed your obliviousness to everything I've been saying by asking for the facts I've been repeating to you over and over again. Yes, the fact is that a fetus, after a certain point, is a human being. It has a consciousness. Before that certain point, it has no consciousness. Now, I'm going to ask this next question with my caps lock and italics on: WHAT IS YOUR PROOF THAT A FETUS IS A HUMAN BEING BEFORE IT HAS A CONSCIOUSNESS? I agree that a fetus with a consciousness is a human being. You think that it's always a human being, period. Give me proof that it is a human being, period, regardless of having a consciousness or not. I'm not 'pro-abortion'. I have said this multiple times and my ideas are not 'pro-abortion'. Stop saying that I'm 'pro-abortion' before I decide to call you a dumb twat, you oblivious nincompoop. Yup, I'm God. Everything is God. You're God to, you know. No, it is a fact that under certain circumstances, sex with a teenager does not harm the teenager or adult, therefore it is not wrong. If it doesn't harm them, how is it wrong? Cheating can be wrong because it harms the emotions of your spouse or mate, depending on their mentality. Some people don't mind open relationships because they aren't emotionally damaged by cheating. Therefore, for them, cheating is not wrong. The same applies to lying and stealing. Example for lying: You're a Jew living in Germany. It's 1938. You look a little more German then Jewish. Nazis ask you if you and your family are Jewish. You lie and say you're not Jewish. You save your family and yourself. If you think that lie was wrong, you are a naive, brainwashed fool. Have an imagination that factors in circumstance. Example of stealing: you're poor and starving. So is your family. A rich man leaves his car unlocked. His wallet with 1000 dollars is in the unlocked car. You steal the money and leave the wallet. You stop your family and you from starving to death long enough to get a job. If you think stealing in that case was wrong, then you apparently are so brainwashed as to not believe in the morality of Robin Hood . Child abuse is never wrong, because it's abuse. Abuse is to harm someone for no reason. Harm is infallible. Child abuse is never right. I do not defend evil. I defend only good. You are just a humongous idiot. In fact, YOU defend evil if you think that the Jew in 1938 shouldn't have lied, if you think the stealing man shouldn't have feed his family, and if the 18 year old with a 14 year old lover should go to jail for the rest of your life. Do you support these things? I hope no. In the case that yes, you are an evil piece of shit. You believe in harming people just because the law tells you to harm people. In which case, you deserve the Hell of the black and white Christianity you so believe in. But, I don't even think YOU are brainwashed enough to say 'yes'. I'm glad you won't. You failed to understand what I said, AGAIN. Fool. People who are unconscious still have a consciousness. When you sleep, your brain is a billion times more active then when you're awake. The same goes for comas. They have a consciousness, and therefore we KNOW that they have a soul. A fetus, on the other hand, is not 'unconscious' at every stage of the pregnancy. To be unconscious, you must have a consciousness in the first place . Until a certain point, a fetus has no consciousness, therefore it is not 'unconscious'. It has no soul. UNLESS YOU CAN PROVE TO ME THAT IT HAS A SOUL WITHOUT HAVING A CONSCIOUSNESS . Of course your baby would do that, it was the size of a melon and had awareness despite being inside you still! It was human! But you know what? It wasn't human the second it's halves came together and fertilized. UNLESS YOU CAN PROVE THAT IT HAD A SOUL WITHOUT HAVING A CONSCIOUSNESS . No. YOU are sad. You are the saddest sad person to ever be sad. You're the coldest thing to ever exist. My mother died in a car accident at the age of 73. We kept her body alive on life support for a week and pulled the plug after coming to terms with the fact that she was dead when her brain died. You despicable c-... No, I'll stop from saying that insult. But you are despicable. Vegetable people are masses of meat without any consciousness. They are not comatose... they are not UNCONSCIOUS. They have NO CONSCIOUSNESS WHATSOEVER. I feel sad for you, being such a fool as to think that keeping a conscious-less piece of meat alive is right. To classify a conscious-less piece of meat as a human being is correct. How about we classify severed limbs as people to, then huh? Then people won't ever be allowed to amputate their arms if they have leprosy. Instead they'll have to die because of some illogical horseshit law that dictates that their arm may not be amputated because their arm is a human being. I'd say screw you, but you know what... I don't need to. Your life is bound to be ruined in the long run if you are so ignorantly brainwashed as you are. A soul can only be logically measured by the presence of consciousness. PROVE TO ME THAT A SOUL CAN EXIST IN HUMAN FLESH WITHOUT IT HAVING A CONSCIOUSNESS. Do it! Because if you can't, you CANNOT prove me wrong and never will!
I'm going to take for granted the notion that federal sanctioning of the taking of human life, be it in favor of whatever "greater good," should not be tolerated. If anyone would like to contest this, let me know and I'll elaborate. While even the most ferocious of pro-borts openly admit that human life is scientifically defined as beginning at conception, others still insist that it is not, and some of their arguments should be taken into consideration. But while we're pontificating on the nature of human life, it is extremely irresponsible to allow potentially millions of human beings to die in the name of another's convenience. Better to err on the side of life.
I agree with you. We should not abort a fetus simply for the purpose that it will cause or bring convenience to us.
So are you are saying that because she wants an abortion she should have it? Then why are you even against abortion? We are talking about a life here not just a fetus. I believe that everyone has a right to live. No fetus should pay the consequences because of a decision made by it's mother. In the year 2000, there were 1.3 million fetus that were killed and the same amount of families were waiting for children to adopt. If you are saying that nothing is wrong if a woman needs an abortion, the you are saying she can have repeat abortions. What if a woman who has unprotected sex and knows the consequences of her actions but later decides she wants an abortion? What is your opinion on that?
I'm very against abortion, but I'm not stupid; I know there are times where it is a necessity. I think it should ultimately stay legal, but should be a lot more restricted. I don't see anything good from a 25-year-old going in and getting an abortion because she just doesn't want the baby. Why should it matter to you if a person does that? That's awfully nosey and judgmental.
Murder is never a necessity. It is wrong no matter what the situation!
No sometimes it is...there is a a type of pregnancy that kills the mother AND the fetus unless its aborted....I pretty much agree that abortion is wrong otherwise though!!
There is a difference between murder and being legally killed because of issues relating to self defense or for the greater good of society.
Any Federal law on abortion is inherently illegal because the Federal government has no authority to regulate abortion. The States individually have the power to. I would be ecstatic if every State in the Union outlawed abortion, just like murder is outlawed.
Abortion isn't murder. A foetus is not a person in the meaningful sense of the word.
Isn't animal cruelty a crime? Animals are technically not people. So shouldn't it apply to unborn humans when one ends their life?
What? Ending a life isn't cruel? So i guess we should let murders and rapes takes place too because those are not cruel acts. Oh and i posted some information on the methods of abortion for you. These are the cruel methods stated again: METHODS OF TERMNATION OF PREGNANCY There are three abortion classifications—surgical abortion, medical abortion, and chemical abortion. They are defined as follows: Surgical abortion: These are abortions that involve an invasive procedure. Major types of surgical abortions include: Suction aspiration: This is the procedure most often used in the first trimester of pregnancy (the first three months). The abortionist inserts a suction tube (similar to a vacuum hose with an extremely sharp end) into the mother's womb. The suction and cutting edge dismember the baby while the hose sucks the body parts into a collection bottle. Dilation and curettage (D&C;): In this procedure, the abortionist uses a loop shaped knife to cut the baby into pieces and scrape the uterine wall. The baby's body parts are then removed and checked to make sure that no pieces were left in the mother's womb. Dilation and extraction (also known as D&X;or partial-birth abortion): Used to kill babies well into the third trimester (as late as 32 weeks old), the abortionist reaches into the mother's womb, grabs the baby's feet with a forceps and pulls the baby out of the mother, except for the head. The abortionist then jams a pair of scissors into the back of the baby's head and spreads the scissors apart to make a hole in the baby's skull. The abortionist removes the scissors and sticks a suction tube into the skull to suck the baby's brain out. The forceps are then used to crush the baby's head and the abortionist pulls the baby's body out the rest of the way. Dilation and evacuation (D&E;): This form of abortion is used to kill babies in the second trimester (24+ weeks). The abortionist uses a forceps to grab parts of the baby (arms and legs) and then tears the baby apart. The baby's head must be crushed in order to remove it because the skull bone has hardened by this stage in the baby's growth. Hysterotomy: Performed in the third trimester, this is basically an abortive Cesarean section (C-section). The abortionist makes in an incision in the mother's abdomen and removes the baby. The baby is then either placed to the side to die or is killed by the abortionist or nurse. Medical abortions: These are abortions that involve the administration of drug specifically intended to abort the child. Common drugs used for medical abortions include: Mifepristone (RU-486): Mifepristone blocks the hormone that helps develop the lining of the uterus during pregnancy (progesterone). This lining is the source of nutrition and protection for the developing baby. The tiny boy or girl is starved to death and then a second drug, misoprostol, causes contractions so that the dead baby is expelled from the womb. Methotrexate: this highly toxic chemical directly attacks and breaks down the baby's fast-growing cells. It also attacks the life-support systems the baby needs to survive. When the systems fail, the baby dies. Misoprostol is then used to cause contractions and push the dead baby out of the womb. Salt poisoning: This technique is used in the second and third trimester. The abortionist sticks a long needle into the mother's womb. The needle contains salt which is then injected into the amniotic fluid surrounding the baby. The baby breathes in, swallows the salt and dies from salt poisoning, dehydration, brain hemorrhage and convulsions. Taking nearly an hour to die, the baby's skin is completely burned, turns red and deteriorates. The baby is in pain the entire time. The mother goes into labor 24 - 48 hours later and delivers a dead baby. Prostaglandins: Used during the second and third trimester, prostaglandin abortions involve the injection of naturally produced hormones into the amniotic sac, causing violent premature labor. During these convulsions the baby is often crushed to death or is born too early to have any chance of surviving. Chemical abortions: These are abortions caused by drugs that, at least some of the time, prevent the implantation of the already-created baby in the uterine lining. Some of the more popular methods of birth control that can be responsible for the deaths of newly-created children are: The Ortho-Evra® birth control patch works by suppressing gonadotropins, which may inhibit ovulation, change the cervical mucus to prevent sperm from reaching the uterus and change the lining of the uterus thereby preventing the implantation of the newly-formed human (Physicians' Desk Reference. 60 ed. Montvale, NJ: Thompson PDR; 2006. 2402). The NuvaRing® vaginal ring works by suppressing gonadotropins, which may inhibit ovulation, change the cervical mucus to prevent sperm from reaching the uterus and change the endometrium thereby preventing the implantation of the newly-formed human (PDR. 2357). Depo-Provera® Contraceptive Injection, when administered at the recommended dose to women every 3 months, inhibits the secretion of gonadotropins which, in turn, prevents follicular maturation and ovulation and results in endometrium thinning. These actions produce its contraceptive effect (PDR 2620). Plan B® is believed to act as an emergency contraceptive principally by preventing ovulation or fertilization, by altering the tubal transport of sperm and/or ova. In addition, it may inhibit implantation by altering the endometrium (PDR 1068
[] I believe Avasked said mistreatment counted as cruelty. Last I checked, mistreating someone includes murder and rape. Cruelty must involving hurting someone, physically or mentally. The fetus cannot think nor can feel.
No one kills a fetus because it isn't a conscious being. A paralyzed person is not in a literal parasitic relationship with another human being. If they are on life support, they are being kept alive by machines. They are not infringing on anyone's rights to bodily autonomy.
In the case of paralyzed or comatose patients, if a caretaker becomes unhappy with the situation, they are legally allowed to quit or otherwise cease their involvement. This is also not an issue of bodily autonomy. The only evidence I need for the parasitism of the fetus is the definition of the word parasite: an organism that lives inside another organism (its host) and siphons resources without reciprocation. The fetus uses the mother's body as its host. It depends solely on her for survival; no one else can step in and take her place if she is unhappy with the situation. If someone or something is using your body to survive, you should have a say in whether or not it is allowed to continue doing so. You should be permitted to decide what medical procedures you will undergo or forego. If you do not get to decide this, then your rights to bodily autonomy are being infringed upon. When the interests of the fetus and the mother collide, the mother should take precedence. This, more than a lack of consciousness in the fetus, is why I support abortion at the discretion of the mother and no one else.
You mentioned the term parasite so my question to you is does parasites posess the DNA which identifies us each as a human? And if the fetus is indeed a parasite then how come it belongs to the race of homo sapiens referred to as humans? To the extent of my knowledge i was taught that parasites feed from their host in return causing injury to the host which is completely the opposite in terms of the fetus. A fetus is formed from a sperm cell and a egg cell which identifies it as a developing human with developing organs. If the fetus is indeed a parasite then you are implying that all humans are parasites at the fetal stage and any doctors or scientist will prove you wrong. The body of a woman is not infringed upon because the fetus is formed from a natural process of reproduction which involves the reproduction of human organisms developing into human beings. Parasites are formed from foreign materials that enter the body but the fetus is formed from the cells of the human body itself which makes it a special function of the sex organs of the human body. Also that people who are caretakers of other people can denounce their rights to take care of that person who is paralyzed but what happens if that person signs a irrevocable power of attorney to stand for the person giving power of attorney. In this case it is a permanent legal contract between the appearer and the person recieving power. And even if this person recuses himself or herself from taking care of the paralyzed person wouldn't that person also depend on the help of doctors to survive? And what about newborns that are one day old? Don't they also feed from the body of the mother? Does that makes them a parasite?
I am just going to repeat what I said before in different terms because I am not sure how I can make it any more clear. A fetus makes its home inside the mother's body and leeches energy and nutrients from her, which is very taxing on her body. The fetus does not contribute anything in return. This is, without a doubt, the definition of a parasitic relationship. I don't know how you can interpret this relationship as the 'opposite' of what I stated as that would entail the mother leeching from the fetus without contributing anything in return. The bodily autonomy of the woman is infringed upon if she doesn't want the fetus to continue using her as a host and she is forbidden from seeking an abortion. Back to the patient: I admit that I am unfamiliar with legal complications like that. However, it still seems that everyone involved has a way of disentangling themselves from a situation of caring for a paralyzed person, if they wish to do so. The person with power of attorney can recuse, as and doctors voluntarily take care of patients because it is their job. If they didn't like it, they could quit or transfer. No matter what kind of bizarre hypothetical one can pose with a paralyzed person, it is still not an issue of the caretakers' rights to bodily autonomy being challenged. If you have a newborn baby and a mother who does not want to take care of that newborn baby, then the solution is simple; she gives up her rights to the baby and someone else takes care of it. It still needs her permission to be able to use her body for survival, but in this case, if she chooses not to grant it, it can survive in other ways. This is not the case with an inviable fetus.
How can the body of a woman be infringed upon when a woman knows the result of sexual intercourse is a fetus? You are failing to understand that a parasite can only be from the animal kingdom and not the human kingdom because the fetus itself is from the family of homo sapiens. A parasite feeds from the host and also injures the host at the same time causing injury. There is no proof of that in a fetus. For a parasitic relationship, those elements of science have to exist. But a mother should not recuse herself from the birth of her fetus when the fetus contains her DNA and is equivalent to murder. Murder is the intentional taking of a human life which in this case refers to abortion itself as well. If a mother chooses not to take care of her child after she gives birth to it, she can be criminally prosecuted for criminal negligence. And if she chooses to give the child away for abortion, then the child will still need the help of another foster mother for survival.
When she is prevented from dealing with her body as she sees fit, her rights to her own body are being infringed upon. This is self-evident and if you disagree you are going to have to explain yourself. There is no such thing as a 'human kingdom'. Humans are as much a part of the animal kingdom as cats, chimps, and mice. Do not assume I don't understand what you are trying to say. It just irrelevant. Regardless of species, the fetus leeches nutrients from the mother and does not return them. Again, this is a parasitic relationship: one organism leeches from another without returning anything. Some definitions include the stipulation of separate species, and others do not. But either way, you cannot possibly argue that the fetus has anything to contribute to the biological relationship. It only takes, it does not return. The claim that pregnancy causes no injury to the woman leads me to believe you have never even spoken to a pregnant woman. Pregnancy is extremely taxing on the mother's body, even in environments where she has no shortage of food and does not need to be active. It often leads to malnutrition, anemia, or high blood pressure, and even when it doesn't do any of these things, it is still exhausting, painful, and their bodies will never be the same. This is technically injury to the woman, even though in some cases it may be minor, and is completely natural. If a woman were to be forced to endure a pregnancy based on what someone else think she should do with her body, I am sure the mental toll would also be enormous. You are studying law and you are trying to say abortion is legally murder? A fetus is not legally considered a human life and so it cannot fit the definition of murder as you are using it. The fetus having possession of the mother's DNA has absolutely nothing to do with whether or not it is murder. Your skin cells have your DNA but you are not committing murder when you scratch yourself. This point is also of subjective importance; don't assume that what matters to you is what matters to everyone. Even if I did consider a fetus to be a human life, I still maintain that the mother's rights override the rights of the fetus. I would be ashamed to live in a country that forced unwilling mothers to incubate babies they didn't want, effectively reducing them to subhumans whose bodies were at the mercy of someone else's whims. This sounds like a nightmare. The government has no right to tell you or any other citizen what medical procedures they must undergo or what medical procedures they may not undergo. The reason the mother is and should be culpable is that, at that point, the child can depend on someone else for life, so if she does not want the responsibility, she is able to someone who will care for the child. Before the fetus is viable, it cannot depend on anyone else for life, so if she does not want the responsibility, she is unable to find anyone else who will finish the pregnancy for her. Abortion is currently the only option for women who do not want to remain pregnant; if there were some way to remove the fetus and put it in the body of a willing surrogate, I would be all for this. Since this is nonsense, I am going to assume you mean 'adoption' instead of 'abortion'. This does not change a single thing about my argument; at this point, the child can depend on someone but its biological mother for survival, so abortion is not necessary if the biological mother no longer wants to care for it.- In addition to my previous point, I would like to pose a hypothetical situation. Someone has a child. When their child is 10 years old, he becomes gravely ill. Only an organ transplant will save him. Unfortunately, the only person who can give him a matching organ in time is one of his parents. For whatever reason, the parent is unwilling to give their child the organ he needs. Should the government get involved and force one of the parents to give the child an organ, under threat of punishment? If yes, why draw the line at a parent-child situation? Why not force every citizen to have their unnecessary organs surgically removed and given to people on the donor list? If no, why not? After all, the humanhood and citizenship of people on the organ list is not even under debate, and you have shown you think it is okay to force people to conserve life/a living human at the expense of their own bodies.
Yes. You do not need to imply that I am so stupid as to not realize a fetus and mother are not the same species. I have already pointed out that some definitions of parasitism include a stipulation about species, and others do not. The distillation of the relationship, however, as I have explained I don't know how many times, is that one organism takes without returning and one organism gives involuntarily without receiving. This exactly describes the relationship between both a mother and a fetus and a parasite and its host. For the sake of not being stuck on this semantic point forever, I will stop using the term 'parasitic relationship' and use the phrase 'a relationship in which the fetus siphons resources without contribution and the mother gives involuntarily and may very well suffer ill consequences of varying severity due to the presence of the fetus'. I am not familiar with the abortion issue in other countries and thus my arguments are concerning abortion in America only. In America, the Supreme Court does not consider abortion to be murder. This is evidence by the fact that doctors who perform abortion in legal states are not arrested and charged with murder, and unless I am mistaken, the women who receive abortions, legal or not, are not arrested and charged with murder either. It doesn't matter to me whether or not abortion was first legalized because of a lie or that one of the involved parties was later arrested for anything. What matters to me is that abortion is a right women should have or continue to have, even if they became pregnant during consensual sex. My feelings on this are not based on any legal precedent. It ruled the fetus is alive. Not that it is equal to a human life. Bacteria, plants, and chickens are alive but they are not human lives. Do you understand the difference? If the Supreme Court had ruled that fetuses are not just alive but also human lives, they would have no choice but to rule abortion as murder. No, and neither can a fetus if you abort it.
I did not say this at all and I am baffled as to how you came to this conclusion. I have given my reasons why the fetus-mother relationship could be defined as parasitic in literally every post since the issue came up. If you are going to blatantly ignore them, I am not going to rephrase them again. Abortion is legal. Murder is not legal. Therefor, legally, abortion cannot be murder. I do not agree with this precedent unless the fetus has passed the threshold of viability. Sorry, abortion is still not murder and yes, it should be a right to women. I am not trying to claim that fetuses are dead, so I am not sure why you brought that up. I realize that they are alive. I just do not put that expression of life on the same level of the expression of life you see in actual conscious human beings. Animals are alive but they are not considered human. That was kind of my point. Being composed of living tissue does not automatically mean you are a human and you get all the rights that come along with that. Don't ignore the part of the sentence that is inconvenient to you. An aborted fetus is equally incapable of developing into a human.
Hey, if women want an abortion they should be allowed,it's their baby
YOU DON'T SEE NOTHING WRONG WITH KILLING AN INNOCENT LIFE????? IF YOU DON'T YOU NEED TO GO GET SOME HELP!!! WHAT IF YOUR PARENTS DID THAT TO YOU???
Never talk in caps, if you really need to, go back to Elementary School.] Don't scratch yourself then. It kills the lives of innocent skin cells. A fetus is also just cells. It is also not human yet. [WHAT IF YOUR PARENTS DID THAT TO YOU???] He wouldn't be here. But he also wouldn't have lost anything, because nothing he had ever done has happened.
It is a woman's choice wither or not to have a baby. If someone doesn't want to then they don't have to, they aren't killing a human because it hasn't been born yet. It is better not to have a baby than to have it and not want it.
It may be the Woman's choice but, it IS murder there is no covering that up it is proven. If they don't want it give it up for adoption things are so much easier now-a-days.
It's not murder. It has not been "proven" and never will be. Murder is ending a human life. A fetus is not human yet. Yes, they could give it to an orphanage, which are already crowded enough as it is.
Abortion is fine if a woman does not want to keep the baby. It's her body. She is the one experiencing the pregnancy. Some say the life inside the woman is not hers. Life is sacred. Therefore she has no right to abort it. But the life is inside her body. Besides, life is far from sacred. Everyday, about 25,000 humans die from hunger. Every day. But nobody really cares. A fetus is not even a fully formed human. In the early stages especially, it is just a bunch of cells. Abortion is something that shouldn't be trivialized. But undoubtedly, for the right reasons, there is no moral issue here at all.
I am 100% pro-abortion for reasons outlined in my previous argument. I have not been disputed and therefore the winning position is pro-choice. Clicking a button to raise a point counter is a shoddy voting method that by no means reflects winning vs losing positions. To summarize, only when you view reincarnation as untrue does abortion mean death. Otherwise it means denying one of many chances to be born. I will support the pro-reincarnation standpoint (prove it wrong I dare you) and say that stopping a rape-baby or a 15 year old mother- baby from having a real chance at life is a crime against humanity perpetrated by fundamental extremists who have nothing better to do than bitch about the lifestyles of others. -If you care about human life so much, protest the war in iraq you ignorant tools spouting off the memes your parents instilled. -A fetus doesn't have the same rights that a fully developed human does, but that doesn't stop religious fanatics and "humanists" from bitching a thousand times louder when it involves a being only arguably alive. -If you view anything with a heart as important, why do you enslave and beat and choke collar and shock collar your pets YOU HYPOCRITICAL MORONS. -If every pro-life woman was raped and impregnated, the female pro-life support would dwindle. Dispute me.
This whole 'pro-life' bullshit is mostly coming from religious fanatics who have been born and raised to repress women. They never had a chance to form their own independent thoughts because their parents shoved their opinions down their throats when they were too young to understand what was going on. I don't care what gender you are, what I do with my body is none of your business. Stop trying to take away my common human rights and actually do something useful, like EDUCATING OUR SEXUALLY-ACTIVE YOUTH!
AGREED WITH ARY11 with everything!!!!!!!! Educating our sexually active youth is vital! Perhaps if we actually took the time to properly discuss the consequences of having un-safe sex, then abortion wouldn't even have to be an issue. nonetheless, regardless of the consequence the decision is still the ONE person's. Which is the woman deciding to have/not have the abortion.
There is a reason why they sides are called Pro-life vs Pro-Choice. Very few (if any) are for abortion, I happen to be one of them, however, I am for a woman's right to chose. The only argument that Pro-life people have to take away the right of other is based off of their own self-righteousness.
NO. Of course I do not agree with abortion. It is murder, and there is no way around it. Did you know there is a law that you go to jail if you hurt a lady that makes her loose her baby, but not to kill it on purpose in abortion. Now does that make sense?
HELL NO! IF YOU WERE GROWN ENOUGH TO SPREAD YOUR FUCKING LEGS THEN YOU ARE GROWN ENOUGH TO TAKE THE RESPONSIBILITY OF YOUR FUCKING KID! YOU KNOW THERE ARE OTHER OPTIONS!!!! KILLING A INNOCENT BABY ISN'T GONNA JUST GO AWAY LIKE A RAINY DAY!!!! YOU WILL HAVE TO LIVE WITH THE GUILT FOREVER!!!!!!!
--------------------------------------- &gt; That is soo true living with the guilt forever know you murder you child it would have been even better if the murder hadn't been born.
Abortion is WRONG! God created that person for a reason. If your not ready to raise a kid then put it up for adoption so it can be with a good family. Dont murder it! Its wrong. It has a life. If you can have sex then you should be ready for the consequences tht come with it!
How many times is this topic going to be posted? The same asshole Materialists come on here and spread their filth. Abortion IS murder people there is no denying that and you can't prove its not. I stand by that.
Abortion is just awful because can a woman just sit there and let the baby get killed when its made of her flesh and the bone of her bone thats just so wrong the you would kill your own child raped or not raped.
....................... Its Bad To Murder Babies..........................
In my opinion it is wrong, because you kill a baby, even if he was not born. We have to save lives, but not to kill them. Also, it is inmoral according to philosophy. In addition, it harms to the health of woman. Even in future this woman cannot have any babies.
you may not know it but a babies heart starts beatin 18 days after conception and you usually dont know until after then that your pregnant so therefore you are killing a child when you get an abortion unless the outcome is going to be you and the child dying then there is no point whatsoever in killing your child. i think that if you get pregnent and dont want to keep the child the right thing to do would be to give it to a baren couple whom long for children. It's a blastula, then embryo, then foetus. It is never a child, for child refers to the immature birthed. A baby refers to the recently birthed. If a mother wants to get pregnant and then abort it is her right to do so. It is none of your business to tell her what she may do with her body, especially when it is such an intimate and emotional decision.
In your point of view it is okey to kill somebody just like you? Even though it is absolutely wrong! It is unnormal and immoral to kill a baby.
Even though this argument contained a segment that invoked religion, I do respect it for supplying more than an endless stream of Bible verses and claims about what God wants or doesn't want. 1. If I somehow find myself in a situation where my survival relies on using someone else's body as a host, then I absolutely support their right to terminate that dependency at the expense of my life, especially if I an incapable of thought or choice. This is why it does not matter to me if a fetus is considered human or not; the government should not force a citizen to sacrifice their right to bodily autonomy for the sake of another living thing, whether or not that living thing is a human. If they did, I don't see why we would not have mandatory organ harvesting from living donors. 2. Not all unwanted pregnancies result from unprotected sex. Also, the choice to have sex (unprotected or not) is not synonymous with the choice to carry a pregnancy to term, in the same way that choosing to smoke is not synonymous with choosing to let lung cancer run its course without seeking treatment. 3. I seriously doubt the validity of all those post-abortion statistics, as a few searches immediately turned up contradicting data. However, even if they are true, it is not the government's job to prevent people from making poor decisions. If it was, then, alcohol, cigarettes, extreme sports, body modification, and any number of 'regrettable' choices would be illegal. Sure, abortion could be safer, and pregnant women could be better educated and supported before and after they make the choice to continue their pregnancy or not. But there are more than sob stories for post-abortion women; there are plenty of women who were grateful for the choice and never looked back.
In addition, I want to add that many childern have been killed because of abortion. Can you imagina what kind of people they could have been if they were not killed? What if you had gave them a chance to live, because they have this right to live. And just imagine how many great people and masterminds have been killed even before their birth?! If they had chance to live, maybe these people would have made our world better!
If the mother is not ready for a child it'll be hard for her to take care of it. If you are taken care of by a mother that is unprepared the chances are life is going to be tough, making it difficult to become a genius.
A fetus does not have the right to life as long as it is nothing more than a product of its mother and father. When that fetus begins to respond to its environment in a way that environmentally expresses its genes to be different than that of what is found in the mother and the father, it is entitled to life. Most scientists believe this occurs in the last trimester of pregnancy, which isn't the best time to have an abortion anyways. But before the fetus begins to respond to its environment like I mentioned, it is not an individual. It has no characteristics different than what the mother and the father have or have at least passed onto it. Something that is not an individual is not entitled to those rights. Regardless, abortion is typically always a tough decision for every woman. Many find it to not be the most moral of decisions, but it is usually found to be the right decision.
These little unborn infants are also living things as we are and when women kill them, it is the almost the same as killing an adult or a child. I can say that God is creator of everything and when we kill unborn babies we destroy his creations. According to the wordds of Nattyc "Abortion is when you kill an unborn baby, and the people who do this are selfish because they don't want to spend money on the baby, confused because they don't want to be pregnant, and evil because they kill children, they also don't trust god and what he provides." abortion is a selfigh decision and I absolutely agree with this statement. We must think about other people, especially about the closet ones. At the time of pregnancy the unborn baby of the wonam is the closest person to her. Women have to appreciaete and save it.
1.Abortion is a form of murder and demeans the value of human life. 2.Other birth control is readily available; thus, abortion shouldn't be a form of birth control. 3.The societal contributions of a potentially valuable human being are wiped out. 4.Women who have abortions often suffer major psychological damage from the experience along with, in some cases, the father of the child. 5.The abortion decision is often made by minors or young adults, who don't have the maturity and life experiences to make good decisions. 6.Abortion exposes women to various health risks and the danger of losing fertility. 7.Abortion is against doctors' Hippocratic Oath that is historically taken by doctors swearing to practice medicine ethically.
what about abortion for woman who get raped. Or if they know the pregnancy is going to be difficult and therefore can lead to death of the baby and/or the mother. Or what if the child is born and there is so many difficulties that the child will not be able to succeed in life?
I guess the implication is that by legalizing abortion, would that encourage in youths a perception that it is therefore okay to have sex since there is always a 'back-up plan' (to simply abort the child)?
To be honest, abortion is murder, as admitted by many scientists. However, the most common abortion is resulting from people being careless and stupid, not rape. Even in the case of rape, abortion should not be done. Even if the fetus is not alive, why terminate it? Who knows? What if the baby would have been born and developed in to a legendary scientist with an IQ of 200? My friend's mother was advised to abort her unborn child because it was very likely the baby would be born with a defect. She refused, and he was born without any defects and actually is a gifted learner in very advanced classes. So by your logic, if someone runs into your yard and plants an oak tree seed, you should take it out of the ground and dispose of it because it was a mistake? Ridiculous.......
A better analogy with your seed metaphor would be if someone dug a little hole in the middle of your house and planted a seed for a tree. At first it didn't matter, but then the tree started to grow and take up your whole house. You couldn't get around, there were birds flying around your house that laid nests in the tree, it was awful. So you decided to remove the tree, it is your property after all. But there is a group of people who worship a book that tells them that removing trees from the ground is immoral and should never be done under any circumstances. They are so influential that it is illegal for you to remove the tree. "What am I supposed to do?" . "Just wait until the tree is grown after a year, and then you can give it up for someone else to care of" "This isn't fair" "I shouldn't have to have something growing in my house that I don't want"
I think abortion should be banned because Abortion eliminates the potential societal contributions of a future human being. An example : "After tens of millions of [abortion] 'procedures', has America lost anything? Another Edison, perhaps? A Gershwin? A Babe Ruth? A Duke Ellington? … As it is, we will never know what abortion has cost us all.
I think if you get raped and you get pregnant. That is the only excuse to get an abortion. Other than that, no.
firstly, i believe abortions is almost never the right choice, maybe in 00.01% of cases it can be allowed, but rarely. but i believe people should have the choice to do it or not, i may not agree with it in many cases, but my beliefs and morals shouldn't effect someone else's, as i may not know the full story.
1."Back alley" abortions would increase if it were made illegal, leading to increased risk of young women dying or becoming sterile. 2.It's better for society to have babies aborted than have them be brought up poor and neglected, where not only will the child suffer but society when that child develops a higher attraction to crime, welfare, etc. 3.It is a more viable option for those who are unable to shoulder the financial burden and responsibility of raising a child on their own. 4.Giving up a child for adoption can be just as emotionally damaging as having an abortion. 5.Abortion is not murder because it is performed before a fetus has developed into a human person.
i believe so. the very fact that abortion has been put it shows that there is a need for it. the various circumstances of the individuals requiring abortion differs greatly; a young couple having made a mistake, a couple with financial problems and cannot cope with another child, rape victims, the list goes on. while there are circumstances when one does not deserve to have an abortion, but the child that is born will suffer the consequences of its parents mistakes. Banning abortion is like imposing the death sentence on youths using drugs.
So are ing it's okay to kill something that could potentionally be someone just like you? I can see that it is your point of view, but even though child cannot be killed! It is unnormal and immoral.
Aside from religious views, there are more ways to look at abortion. By any means, abortion should never be encouraged because it is, indeed the killing of a life and we do not have the right to determine the undertaking of any life, save for our own. However, there are exceptional cases where abortion would be acceptable. First and foremost. Abortion should never occur simply because of teenage pregnancy - a reason for abortion that has become more prevalent in recent years. That is because teenagers have to understand and take up the responsibility of what they have done. If they had had sex, then it's of utmost importance that they take up any consequences that come along with it. Thus abortion should not be encouraged if it is an escape route for people to run away from problems. But, however, there are also reasons why abortion should be acceptable and one reason would be if it puts the mother's health at risk. If the mother of the child faces numerous health issues such a cancer, high blood pressure, it is of grave importance that we weight the pros and cons of the pregnancy. For if the childbirth of a newborn forsakes the life of the mother, aren't we killing another life as well? Of course, it is up to the couple as to whether which option they wish to take, but their opinions should be duly respected because the mother's life is at risk.
well, it is a bad decision to have abortion. even if you had an emotional past or some effect that leads to having abortion, honestly the baby did not do anything to you. what happened to you should not have killed the baby. you call yourself human. taking a life is nothing to go on living or smiling about, and then how could you even begin to wake up everyday knowing you took your own baby's life.. it is cruel and such an evil thing to do.. and i am pretty sure its not our body but in soul were all connected and we never said it was ours to begin with.. your babies are human and deserved to be loved also.. how will they ever know if you end their lives.
Funny, I would say since the baby hasn't done anything to you, you shouldn't subjugate it to a life of loneliness and misery. There are already enough unloved orphans in the world, why bring in another? If I had to choose, I would rather my life be ended as a fetus so I can go find another body to live in, perhaps one with a mother whom would want me for a reason greater than guilt. A reason like love .
So because I disagree with you on capitalism, you're going to stalk and harass me now? That is utterly pathetic. Most children in the adoption system don't get adopted, there's just too many of them. Hmm, wow that was quick. I guess there just wasn't any real substance to your post. ;)
So no one can love an adopted child? We have enough children that are not being taken up in homes and families, and you just want to exacerbate this.
A couple critical points: This Is not equal to this uploads/1/foetus.jpg Or this A baby is not a foetus or an embryo. The words are not interchangeable. When a woman is pregnant, a baby isn't sitting in her womb for nine months already developed. Calling it a baby is a way to emotionally hijack the topic. It's like calling hamburgers "puppies" in order to make us vegetarians. Second point: A foetus is not a life. It hasn't lived in the outside world yet and formed an identity.
a spider is not human life therefore it is not as precious for it does not have a soul and i for one usually don't kill spiders unless they are of harm! Nothing has a soul. We simply live. A spider has as much life as you and I. We consider ourselves more precious because of our minds, and a foetus has no mind.
BS foetuses have brains and central nervous systems...they can feel pain and even hear sounds outside of the womb...do you know anything?
A brain is not a mind. They are separate. A mind is a brain with identity. They respond to sounds and stimuli, they are not really aware. How could they be aware as we think of it when an infant is only starting to develop this aspect of mind?
Some evidence please? Otherwise LOL It is an obvious extrapolation from known facts. Taxis does not require a mind, as observed in simple animals like fruit flies. Brains themselves are complicated entities, which in Humans mature at around 18 to 23 years. Infant brains are still critically forming, hence why they are so dependent upon us and only start learning language after at least the first year and motor function is under critical development. Why would you assume that an infant has a fully aware mind at birth, much less the weeks before birth all the way down to the first twelve weeks of pregnancy?
how can you compare a spider to a human life! a spider is not creative, a spider is not capable of love or emotion, a spider is not very productive, and a spider is an insect not a human. plus a fudus if you want to call it that does have a mind or else it would not be able to curl its toes and suck it's thumb nor would it be able to grow!
Both are equally alive. Both have their own respective niches. For example, can you make your own webbing, or inject venom? You're arguing that a spider is not a human, not that a spider is less alive than A foetus has a brain, but it has no identity yet. A foetus is incomplete, like an empty shell.
I do not believe in abortion. You are killing a living breathing human being. I understand why certain people might want to get an abortion, i.e they were raped or can't afford to take care of it, but if that's the case then just give the child to someone else.
This is a human being: images/amazing_human_being_01.jpg This is a foetus: foetusREX010606_228x188.jpg It has no mind. It has no awareness. It is a burden to someone else. This is why abortion exists.
What if this was you? What if somebody right now was deciding whether or not to let you live or die? It would not matter because I would not exist yet to object. A foetus has no identity. It isn't aware of what is happening.
The true cause of this 'burden' is the irresponsibilty of idiots which lead to elective abortion. The second major issue I have with your distastefully anti human post is that you think a human being is only a human being after it has been born...that is scientifically speaking utter garbage...revealing a lack of understanding about human biology. Abortion is murder. Pure and simple. I am no christian incidently...my premise is entirely logical.
Is it really? How fascinating Yes personal responsibility is a terrible thing...something we should never expect of anyone... How subjectively arbitrary, you think your opinion here gives weight to your argument? Interesting. Semantics, depends which nation you live in. OK Abortion is killing, pure and simple... Have I seen a foetus? What a seemingly stupid question...what relevance is that? Please elucidate.
You keep throwing around that word "unique" as if it is a prerequisite to life that it have a unique genome. Bananas are asexually propagated, they bear no seeds, so they share the same genome for all members of a cultivar. I think you have missed my basic point. A human foetus is nothing like a fruit or a banana...so your comparisons are utterly absurd.
Both are unfeeling. Both are unaware of existence. Both are composed of cells. Both have metabolism. Both are offspring of a parent (a fruit is cells around seeds). Nonsense the foetus has a central nervous system fruit do not. Secondly one is animal the other is plant. I think you need some biology lessons lol.
Plants have systems which are alike our nervous system, merely simpler and with different purpose. I repeat! Plants do not have central nervous systems...foetuses do. Brain waves have been recorded by EEG (electro- encephalograph) in the human embryo 40 days after fertilisation human-development#first
So in a historical sense, yes, your testes have cells which are animals (animals need not be multicellular) but which are evolved to be genetically identical and inter-dependent. O dear... You could argue that a human being is a composite of billions of animals working together...so what? How does that prove that a foetus is no more special than a Plum? A foetus is human...a Plum is not. That is the crux...which you do not grokk...
I'm pro life, but this is a free country. Abortion is the woman's right, as much has I disagree with it. The only time I agree with it, is if the woman's life is in severe danger from the pregnancy. I digress. A heavy handed government controlling these sorts of rights doesn't sit well with me.
False. While society's definition of Pro-life is actually a purely anti-abortion stance. I follow a more traditional understanding of the definition of Pro-life, which is I am for whatever is more conducive to saving human life.Also, did you even read my comment? I said I personally believe that it should only happen if it is to save the mother's life. However, people should be free to get abortions if they want too. That's the beauty of choice. Without the option to do wrong, "right" is meaningless.
Regardless of a biased opinion of whether abortion is 'shameful' or not, abortion should absolutely be legal. A woman has rights to her own body, as do men to their own. It is arguable that it is 'killing' or 'murdering' a creature, but you cannot end something that hasn't ever been started. Women's rights to their very own bodies should not be violated because of less open minds. It should never be a question that women are unaffected by the choices they make every day. I conclude with, it is only the choice of the maker of the decision, and that decision is none other than the person that is in direct control of it, especially if it directly effects the health of a one persons body.
I agree with you until: "" The fetus being killed most certainly has been started. It is a human being. It may not have any great capacity for intelligent thoughts or feelings, but neither do newborns. Is it OK to kill them too? I will agree with you other point that women (and men) should be able to do whatever it is they want to their own bodies. But in the case of abortion, this right does not apply because it does not only pertain to the woman's body, but the body of another human being still attached to her. No one should have the right to kill innocent people.
Bullshit. Try pricking a newborn with a needle and see if it has feelings, won't you? No, you're wrong here. The fetus is considered a parasite. According to the OED, the scientific definition of a parasite is "An animal or plant which lives in or upon another organism (technically called its host) and draws its nutriment directly from it. Also extended to animals or plants that live as tenants of others, but not at their expense (strictly called commensal or symbiotic); also to those which depend on others in various ways for sustenance, as the cuckoo, the skua-gull, etc." (Emphasis my own) All a woman does to continue with the pregnancy is to allow the fetus to live within her and draw nutrients from her. Conversely, when a woman chooses to abort the fetus, she is simply dis allowing the fetus to continue living within her. The fetus, within the first trimester, is not a person.
Any creature with a nervous system has "feelings", what I am referring to are thoughts and emotions. No, It is both, humans maybe parasites for the first nine months of their existence, but they are still human. Thus killing a human being. You made the point earlier that unborn babies are not human, but rather parasites. Unborn babies still fit the definition of "parasite" regardless of what trimester they're in. Do you contend that the unborn baby can be both a parasite and a person at the same time?
Are ing that a new born does not have thoughts and/or emotions? I did not say that the fetus is not a Homo sapien. No fair minded person will accuse me of saying such a thing. Thus killing a human being. So? You have not shown that this is morally wrong in any way. I said that fetuses are parasites. But I did not say that they are not Homo sapien. Get your facts right. For example, a tick can both be considered an arthropod and a parasite. In any case, you still haven't shown that abortion is morally wrong.
Morality exists in the mind of the individual. I am only saying that abortion involves the killing of an innocent human being. If you believe that it is morally acceptable to kill innocent human beings, that is morality for you. No one can "prove" morality to someone who does not accept certain basic warrants.
I am so on the basis of Natural Rights. At some point, the living thing inside a woman's womb becomes a human being. I do not believe this to be at conception, and I cannot define exactly when that point is. But it is fairly clear to me that it is not one instant before birth. My daughter was born six weeks premature. If she had not been premature, would it have been legitimate to abort her two weeks later? Would it be legitimate for a woman to delay labor via drugs and have her baby aborted past the time it was actually due? And finally, most late-term abortions amount to clear infanticide, as the baby is actually living outside of the womb before it is killed. Must I accept this in order to be "pro-choice" in your eyes? Must I oppose a first-trimester abortion of a rape or incest victim in order to be "pro-life"? You make the argument that "pro-life" people should be for legal abortion, since legal abortion leads to fewer abortions and deaths of mothers having abortions. I question these data. Most of the countries where abortion is illegal are poorer and have other problems -- it is thus hard to isolate the effect of abortion laws on abortion rates. But, for the sake of argument, let's say you are right: Would this then also justify any other crime? What if the legalization of murdering one person a year was demonstrated to reduce the total number of violent crimes -- could it be justified? You are using utilitarian ethics, whereas many non-religious and some religious abortion opponents use Natural Rights ethics. Utilitarianism allows for any abrogation of rights if it can be seen as being "in the common good," whereas Natural Rights allow for no such abrogations. There is nothing hypocritical about being a Natural Rights-based opponent of abortion.
It shouldn't be legal there are ways the baby can have different parents that can raise it.
